[001]

Table of Contents

 

Title Page

Acknowledgements

 

Chapter 1 - Introduction—Prison Reform or Prison Abolition?

Chapter 2 - Slavery, Civil Rights, and Abolitionist Perspectives Toward
Prison

Chapter 3 - Imprisonment and Reform

Chapter 4 - How Gender Structures the Prison System

Chapter 5 - The Prison Industrial Complex

Chapter 6 - Abolitionist Alternatives

 

Resources

Notes

About the Author

Copyright Page

[001]

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

I should not be listed as the sole author of this book, for its ideas
reflect various forms of collaboration over the last six years with
activists, scholars, prisoners, and cultural workers who have tried to
reveal and contest the impact of the prison industrial complex on the
lives of people—within and outside prisons—throughout the world. The
organizing committee for the 1998 Berkeley conference, Critical
Resistance: Beyond the Prison Industrial Complex, included Bo (rita d.
brown), Ellen Barry, Jennifer Beach, Rose Braz, Julie Browne, Cynthia
Chandler, Kamari Clarke, Leslie DiBenedetto Skopek, Gita Drury, Rayne
Galbraith, Ruthie Gilmore, Naneen Karraker, Terry Kupers, Rachel
Lederman, Joyce Miller, Dorsey Nunn, Dylan Rodriguez, Eli Rosenblatt,
Jane Segal, Cassandra Shaylor, Andrea Smith, Nancy Stoller, Julia
Sudbury, Robin Templeton, and Suran Thrift. In the long process of
coordinating plans for this conference, which attracted over three
thousand people, we worked through a number of the questions that I
raise in this book. I thank the members of that committee, including
those who used the conference as a foundation to build the organization
Critical Resistance. In 2000, I was a member of a University of
California Humanities Research Institute Resident Research Group and had
the opportunity to participate
in regular discussions on many of these issues. I thank the members of
the group—Gina Dent, Ruth Gilmore, Avery Gordon, David Goldberg, Nancy
Schepper Hughes, and Sandy Barringer—for their invaluable insights.
Cassandra Shaylor and I coauthored a report to the 2001 World Conference
Against Racism on women of color and the prison industrial complex—a
number of whose ideas have made their way into this book. I have also
drawn from a number of other recent articles I have published in various
collections. Over the last five years Gina Dent and I have made numerous
presentations together, published together, and engaged in protracted
conversations on what it means to do scholarly and activist work that
can encourage us all to imagine a world without prisons. I thank her for
reading the manuscript and I am deeply appreciative of her intellectual
and emotional support. Finally, I thank Greg Ruggiero, the editor of
this series, for his patience and encouragement.

1

INTRODUCTION—PRISON REFORM OR PRISON ABOLITION?

In most parts of the world, it is taken for granted that whoever is
convicted of a serious crime will be sent to prison. In some
countries—including the United States—where capital punishment has not
yet been abolished, a small but significant number of people are
sentenced to death for what are considered especially grave crimes. Many
people are familiar with the campaign to abolish the death penalty. In
fact, it has already been abolished in most countries. Even the
staunchest advocates of capital punishment acknowledge the fact that the
death penalty faces serious challenges. Few people find life without the
death penalty difficult to imagine.

On the other hand, the prison is considered an inevitable and permanent
feature of our social lives. Most people are quite surprised to hear
that the prison abolition movement also has a long history—one that
dates back to the historical appearance of the prison as the main form
of punishment. In fact, the most natural reaction is to assume that
prison activists—even those who consciously refer to themselves as
“antiprison activists”—are simply trying to ameliorate prison conditions
or perhaps to reform the prison in more fundamental ways. In most
circles prison abolition is simply unthinkable and implausible. Prison
abolitionists are dismissed
as utopians and idealists whose ideas are at best unrealistic and
impracticable, and, at worst, mystifying and foolish. This is a measure
of how difficult it is to envision a social order that does not rely on
the threat of sequestering people in dreadful places designed to
separate them from their communities and families. The prison is
considered so “natural” that it is extremely hard to imagine life
without it.

It is my hope that this book will encourage readers to question their
own assumptions about the prison. Many people have already reached the
conclusion that the death penalty is an outmoded form of punishment that
violates basic principles of human rights. It is time, I believe, to
encourage similar conversations about the prison. During my own career
as an antiprison activist I have seen the population of U.S. prisons
increase with such rapidity that many people in black, Latino, and
Native American communities now have a far greater chance of going to
prison than of getting a decent education. When many young people decide
to join the military service in order to avoid the inevitability of a
stint in prison, it should cause us to wonder whether we should not try
to introduce better alternatives.

The question of whether the prison has become an obsolete institution
has become especially urgent in light of the fact that more than two
million people (out of a world total of nine million) now inhabit U.S.
prisons, jails, youth facilities, and immigrant detention centers. Are
we willing to relegate ever larger numbers of people from racially
oppressed communities to an isolated existence marked by authoritarian
regimes, violence, disease, and technologies of seclusion that produce
severe mental instability? According to a recent study, there may be
twice as many people suffering from mental illness who are in jails and
prisons than there are in all psychiatric hospitals in the United States
combined.¹

When I first became involved in antiprison activism during the late
1960s, I was astounded to learn that there were then close to two
hundred thousand people in prison. Had anyone told me that in three
decades ten times as many people would be locked away in cages, I would
have been absolutely incredulous. I imagine that I would have responded
something like this: “As racist and undemocratic as this country may be
[remember, during that period, the demands of the Civil Rights movement
had not yet been consolidated], I do not believe that the U.S.
government will be able to lock up so many people without producing
powerful public resistance. No, this will never happen, not unless this
country plunges into fascism.” That might have been my reaction thirty
years ago. The reality is that we were called upon to inaugurate the
twenty-first century by accepting the fact that two million people—a
group larger than the population of many countries—are living their
lives in places like Sing Sing, Leavenworth, San Quentin, and Alderson
Federal Reformatory for Women. The gravity of these numbers becomes even
more apparent when we consider that the U.S. population in general is
less than five percent of the world’s total, whereas more than twenty
percent of the world’s combined prison population can be claimed by the
United States. In Elliott Currie’s words, “[t]he prison has become a
looming presence in our society to an extent unparalleled in our history
or that of any other industrial democracy. Short of major wars, mass
incarceration has been the most thoroughly implemented government social
program of our time.”²

In thinking about the possible obsolescence of the prison, we should ask
how it is that so many people could end up in prison without major
debates regarding the efficacy of incarceration. When the drive to
produce more prisons and incarcerate
ever larger numbers of people occurred in the 1980s during what is known
as the Reagan era, politicians argued that “tough on crime”
stances—including certain imprisonment and longer sentences—would keep
communities free of crime. However, the practice of mass incarceration
during that period had little or no effect on official crime rates. In
fact, the most obvious pattern was that larger prison populations led
not to safer communities, but, rather, to even larger prison
populations. Each new prison spawned yet another new prison. And as the
U.S. prison system expanded, so did corporate involvement in
construction, provision of goods and services, and use of prison labor.
Because of the extent to which prison building and operation began to
attract vast amounts of capital—from the construction industry to food
and health care provision—in a way that recalled the emergence of the
military industrial complex, we began to refer to a “prison industrial
complex.”³

Consider the case of California, whose landscape has been thoroughly
prisonized over the last twenty years. The first state prison in
California was San Quentin, which opened in 1852.⁴ Folsom, another
well-known institution, opened in 1880. Between 1880 and 1933, when a
facility for women was opened in Tehachapi, there was not a single new
prison constructed. In 1952, the California Institution for Women opened
and Tehachapi became a new prison for men. In all, between 1852 and
1955, nine prisons were constructed in California. Between 1962 and
1965, two camps were established, along with the California
Rehabilitation Center. Not a single prison opened during the second half
of the sixties, nor during the entire decade of the 1970s.

However, a massive project of prison construction was initiated during
the 1980s—that is, during the years of the Reagan presidency. Nine
prisons, including the Northern California
Facility for Women, were opened between 1984 and 1989. Recall that it
had taken more than a hundred years to build the first nine California
prisons. In less than a single decade, the number of California prisons
doubled. And during the 1990s, twelve new prisons were opened, including
two more for women. In 1995 the Valley State Prison for Women was
opened. According to its mission statement, it “provides 1,980 women’s
beds for California’s overcrowded prison system.” However, in 2002,
there were 3,570 prisoners⁵ and the other two women’s prisons were
equally overcrowded.

There are now thirty-three prisons, thirty-eight camps, sixteen
community correctional facilities, and five tiny prisoner mother
facilities in California. In 2002 there were 157,979 people incarcerated
in these institutions, including approximately twenty thousand people
whom the state holds for immigration violations. The racial composition
of this prison population is revealing. Latinos, who are now in the
majority, account for 35.2 percent; African-Americans 30 percent; and
white prisoners 29.2 percent.⁶ There are now more women in prison in the
state of California than there were in the entire country in the early
1970s. In fact, California can claim the largest women’s prison in the
world, Valley State Prison for Women, with its more than thirty-five
hundred inhabitants. Located in the same town as Valley State and
literally across the street is the second-largest women’s prison in the
world—Central California Women’s Facility—whose population in 2002 also
hovered around thirty-five hundred.⁷

If you look at a map of California depicting the location of the
thirty-three state prisons, you will see that the only area that is not
heavily populated by prisons is the area north of Sacramento. Still,
there are two prisons in the town of Susanville, and Pelican Bay, one of
the state’s notorious super-maximum security prisons, is near the Oregon
border.
California artist Sandow Birk was inspired by the colonizing of the
landscape by prisons to produce a series of thirty-three landscape
paintings of these institutions and their surroundings. They are
collected in his book _Incarcerated: Visions of California in the
Twenty-first Century._⁸

I present this brief narrative of the prisonization of the California
landscape in order to allow readers to grasp how easy it was to produce
a massive system of incarceration with the implicit consent of the
public. Why were people so quick to assume that locking away an
increasingly large proportion of the U.S. population would help those
who live in the free world feel safer and more secure? This question can
be formulated in more general terms. Why do prisons tend to make people
think that their own rights and liberties are more secure than they
would be if prisons did not exist? What other reasons might there have
been for the rapidity with which prisons began to colonize the
California landscape?

Geographer Ruth Gilmore describes the expansion of prisons in California
as “a geographical solution to socio-economic problems.”⁹ Her analysis
of the prison industrial complex in California describes these
developments as a response to surpluses of capital, land, labor, and
state capacity.

California’s new prisons are sited on devalued rural land, most, in fact
on formerly irrigated agricultural acres . . . The State bought land
sold by big landowners. And the State assured the small, depressed towns
now shadowed by prisons that the new, recession-proof, non-polluting
industry would jump-start local redevelopment.¹⁰

But, as Gilmore points out, neither the jobs nor the more general
economic revitalization promised by prisons has
occurred. At the same time, this promise of progress helps us to
understand why the legislature and California’s voters decided to
approve the construction of all these new prisons. People wanted to
believe that prisons would not only reduce crime, they would also
provide jobs and stimulate economic development in out-of-the-way
places.

At bottom, there is one fundamental question: Why do we take prison for
granted? While a relatively small proportion of the population has ever
directly experienced life inside prison, this is not true in poor black
and Latino communities. Neither is it true for Native Americans or for
certain Asian-American communities. But even among those people who must
regrettably accept prison sentences—especially young people—as an
ordinary dimension of community life, it is hardly acceptable to engage
in serious public discussions about prison life or radical alternatives
to prison. It is as if prison were an inevitable fact of life, like
birth and death.

On the whole, people tend to take prisons for granted. It is difficult
to imagine life without them. At the same time, there is reluctance to
face the realities hidden within them, a fear of thinking about what
happens inside them. Thus, the prison is present in our lives and, at
the same time, it is absent from our lives. To think about this
simultaneous presence and absence is to begin to acknowledge the part
played by ideology in shaping the way we interact with our social
surroundings. We take prisons for granted but are often afraid to face
the realities they produce. After all, no one wants to go to prison.
Because it would be too agonizing to cope with the possibility that
anyone, including ourselves, could become a prisoner, we tend to think
of the prison as disconnected from our own lives. This is even true for
some of us, women as well as men, who have already experienced
imprisonment.

We thus think about imprisonment as a fate reserved for others, a fate
reserved for the “evildoers,” to use a term recently popularized by
George W. Bush. Because of the persistent power of racism, “criminals”
and “evildoers” are, in the collective imagination, fantasized as people
of color. The prison therefore functions ideologically as an abstract
site into which undesirables are deposited, relieving us of the
responsibility of thinking about the real issues afflicting those
communities from which prisoners are drawn in such disproportionate
numbers. This is the ideological work that the prison performs—it
relieves us of the responsibility of seriously engaging with the
problems of our society, especially those produced by racism and,
increasingly, global capitalism.

What, for example, do we miss if we try to think about prison expansion
without addressing larger economic developments? We live in an era of
migrating corporations. In order to escape organized labor in this
country—and thus higher wages, benefits, and so on—corporations roam the
world in search of nations providing cheap labor pools. This corporate
migration thus leaves entire communities in shambles. Huge numbers of
people lose jobs and prospects for future jobs. Because the economic
base of these communities is destroyed, education and other surviving
social services are profoundly affected. This process turns the men,
women, and children who live in these damaged communities into perfect
candidates for prison.

In the meantime, corporations associated with the punishment industry
reap profits from the system that manages prisoners and acquire a clear
stake in the continued growth of prison populations. Put simply, this is
the era of the prison industrial complex. The prison has become a black
hole into which the detritus of contemporary capitalism is deposited.
Mass imprisonment generates profits as it devours social
wealth, and thus it tends to reproduce the very conditions that lead
people to prison. There are thus real and often quite complicated
connections between the deindustrialization of the economy—a process
that reached its peak during the 1980s—and the rise of mass
imprisonment, which also began to spiral during the Reagan-Bush era.
However, the demand for more prisons was represented to the public in
simplistic terms. More prisons were needed because there was more crime.
Yet many scholars have demonstrated that by the time the prison
construction boom began, official crime statistics were already falling.
Moreover, draconian drug laws were being enacted, and “three-strikes”
provisions were on the agendas of many states.

In order to understand the proliferation of prisons and the rise of the
prison industrial complex, it might be helpful to think further about
the reasons we so easily take prisons for granted. In California, as we
have seen, almost two-thirds of existing prisons were opened during the
eighties and nineties. Why was there no great outcry? Why was there such
an obvious level of comfort with the prospect of many new prisons? A
partial answer to this question has to do with the way we consume media
images of the prison, even as the realities of imprisonment are hidden
from almost all who have not had the misfortune of doing time. Cultural
critic Gina Dent has pointed out that our sense of familiarity with the
prison comes in part from representations of prisons in film and other
visual media.

The history of visuality linked to the prison is also a main
reinforcement of the institution of the prison as a naturalized part of
our social landscape. The history of film has always been wedded to the
representation of incarceration. Thomas Edison’s
first films (dating back to the 1901 reenactment presented as newsreel,
_Execution of Czolgosz with Panorama of Auburn Prison_) included footage
of the darkest recesses of the prison. Thus, the prison is wedded to our
experience of visuality, creating also a sense of its permanence as an
institution. We also have a constant flow of Hollywood prison films, in
fact a genre.¹¹

Some of the most well known prison films are: _I Want to Live, Papillon,
Cool Hand Luke,_ and _Escape from Alcatraz._ It also bears mentioning
that television programming has become increasingly saturated with
images of prisons. Some recent documentaries include the A&E series _The
Big House_, which consists of programs on San Quentin, Alcatraz,
Leavenworth, and Alderson Federal Reformatory for Women. The
long-running HBO program _Oz_ has managed to persuade many viewers that
they know exactly what goes on in male maximum-security prisons.

But even those who do not consciously decide to watch a documentary or
dramatic program on the topic of prisons inevitably consume prison
images, whether they choose to or not, by the simple fact of watching
movies or TV. It is virtually impossible to avoid consuming images of
prison. In 1997, I was myself quite astonished to find, when I
interviewed women in three Cuban prisons, that most of them narrated
their prior awareness of prisons—that is, before they were actually
incarcerated—as coming from the many Hollywood films they had seen. The
prison is one of the most important features of our image environment.
This has caused us to take the existence of prisons for granted. The
prison has become a key ingredient of our common sense. It is there, all
around us. We do not question whether it should
exist. It has become so much a part of our lives that it requires a
great feat of the imagination to envision life beyond the prison.

This is not to dismiss the profound changes that have occurred in the
way public conversations about the prison are conducted. Ten years ago,
even as the drive to expand the prison system reached its zenith, there
were very few critiques of this process available to the public. In
fact, most people had no idea about the immensity of this expansion.
This was the period during which internal changes—in part through the
application of new technologies—led the U.S. prison system in a much
more repressive direction. Whereas previous classifications had been
confined to low, medium, and maximum security, a new category was
invented—that of the super-maximum security prison, or the supermax. The
turn toward increased repression in a prison system, distinguished from
the beginning of its history by its repressive regimes, caused some
journalists, public intellectuals, and progressive agencies to oppose
the growing reliance on prisons to solve social problems that are
actually exacerbated by mass incarceration.

In 1990, the Washington-based Sentencing Project published a study of
U.S. populations in prison and jail, and on parole and probation, which
concluded that one in four black men between the ages of twenty and
twenty-nine were among these numbers.¹² Five years later, a second study
revealed that this percentage had soared to almost one in three (32.2
percent). Moreover, more than one in ten Latino men in this same age
range were in jail or prison, or on probation or parole. The second
study also revealed that the group experiencing the greatest increase
was black women, whose imprisonment increased by seventy-eight
percent.¹³ According to the Bureau of Justice Statistics,
African-Americans
as a whole now represent the majority of state and federal prisoners,
with a total of 803,400 black inmates—118,600 more than the total number
of white inmates.¹⁴ During the late 1990s major articles on prison
expansion appeared in _Newsweek, Harper’s, Emerge,_ and _Atlantic
Monthly_. Even Colin Powell raised the question of the rising number of
black men in prison when he spoke at the 2000 Republican National
Convention, which declared George W. Bush its presidential candidate.

Over the last few years the previous absence of critical positions on
prison expansion in the political arena has given way to proposals for
prison reform. While public discourse has become more flexible, the
emphasis is almost inevitably on generating the changes that will
produce a _better_ prison system. In other words, the increased
flexibility that has allowed for critical discussion of the problems
associated with the expansion of prisons also restricts this discussion
to the question of prison reform.

As important as some reforms may be—the elimination of sexual abuse and
medical neglect in women’s prison, for example—frameworks that rely
exclusively on reforms help to produce the stultifying idea that nothing
lies beyond the prison. Debates about strategies of decarceration, which
should be the focal point of our conversations on the prison crisis,
tend to be marginalized when reform takes the center stage. The most
immediate question today is how to prevent the further expansion of
prison populations and how to bring as many imprisoned women and men as
possible back into what prisoners call “the free world.” How can we move
to decriminalize drug use and the trade in sexual services? How can we
take seriously strategies of restorative rather than exclusively
punitive justice? Effective alternatives involve both transformation of
the techniques for addressing
“crime” and of the social and economic conditions that track so many
children from poor communities, and especially communities of color,
into the juvenile system and then on to prison. The most difficult and
urgent challenge today is that of creatively exploring new terrains of
justice, where the prison no longer serves as our major anchor.

2

SLAVERY, CIVIL RIGHTS, AND ABOLITIONIST PERSPECTIVES TOWARD PRISON

“Advocates of incarceration . . . hoped that the penitentiary would
_rehabilitate_ its inmates. Whereas philosophers perceived a ceaseless
state of war between chattel slaves and their masters, criminologists
hoped to negotiate a peace treaty of sorts within the prison walls. Yet
herein lurked a paradox: if the penitentiary’s internal regime resembled
that of the plantation so closely that the two were often loosely
equated, how could the prison possibly function to rehabilitate
criminals?”

—Adam Jay Hirsch¹⁵

 

The prison is not the only institution that has posed complex challenges
to the people who have lived with it and have become so inured to its
presence that they could not conceive of society without it. Within the
history of the United States the system of slavery immediately comes to
mind. Although as early as the American Revolution antislavery advocates
promoted the elimination of African bondage, it took almost a century to
achieve the abolition of the “peculiar institution.” White antislavery
abolitionists such as John Brown and William Lloyd Garrison were
represented in the
dominant media of the period as extremists and fanatics. When Frederick
Douglass embarked on his career as an antislavery orator, white
people—even those who were passionate abolitionists—refused to believe
that a black slave could display such intelligence. The belief in the
permanence of slavery was so widespread that even white abolitionists
found it difficult to imagine black people as equals.

It took a long and violent civil war in order to legally disestablish
the “peculiar institution.” Even though the Thirteenth Amendment to the
U.S. Constitution outlawed involuntary servitude, white supremacy
continued to be embraced by vast numbers of people and became deeply
inscribed in new institutions. One of these post-slavery institutions
was lynching, which was widely accepted for many decades thereafter.
Thanks to the work of figures such as Ida B. Wells, an antilynching
campaign was gradually legitimized during the first half of the
twentieth century. The NAACP, an organization that continues to conduct
legal challenges against discrimination, evolved from these efforts to
abolish lynching.

Segregation ruled the South until it was outlawed a century after the
abolition of slavery. Many people who lived under Jim Crow could not
envision a legal system defined by racial equality. When the governor of
Alabama personally attempted to prevent Arthurine Lucy from enrolling in
the University of Alabama, his stance represented the inability to
imagine black and white people ever peaceably living and studying
together. “Segregation today, segregation tomorrow, segregation forever”
are the most well known words of this politician, who was forced to
repudiate them some years later when segregation had proved far more
vulnerable than he could have imagined.

Although government, corporations, and the dominant
media try to represent racism as an unfortunate aberration of the past
that has been relegated to the graveyard of U.S. history, it continues
to profoundly influence contemporary structures, attitudes, and
behaviors. Nevertheless, anyone who would dare to call for the
reintroduction of slavery, the organization of lynch mobs, or the
reestablishment of legal segregation would be summarily dismissed. But
it should be remembered that the ancestors of many of today’s most
ardent liberals could not have imagined life without slavery, life
without lynching, or life without segregation. The 2001 World Conference
Against Racism, Racial Discrimination, Xenophobia, and Related
Intolerances held in Durban, South Africa, divulged the immensity of the
global task of eliminating racism. There may be many disagreements
regarding what counts as racism and what are the most effective
strategies to eliminate it. However, especially with the downfall of the
apartheid regime in South Africa, there is a global consensus that
racism should not define the future of the planet.

I have referred to these historical examples of efforts to dismantle
racist institutions because they have considerable relevance to our
discussion of prisons and prison abolition. It is true that slavery,
lynching, and segregation acquired such a stalwart ideological quality
that many, if not most, could not foresee their decline and collapse.
Slavery, lynching, and segregation are certainly compelling examples of
social institutions that, like the prison, were once considered to be as
everlasting as the sun. Yet, in the case of all three examples, we can
point to movements that assumed the radical stance of announcing the
obsolescence of these institutions. It may help us gain perspective on
the prison if we try to imagine how strange and discomforting the
debates about the obsolescence of slavery must have been to those who
took the “peculiar institution” for granted—and especially to those
who reaped direct benefits from this dreadful system of racist
exploitation. And even though there was widespread resistance among
black slaves, there were even some among them who assumed that they and
their progeny would be always subjected to the tyranny of slavery.

I have introduced three abolition campaigns that were eventually more or
less successful to make the point that social circumstances transform
and popular attitudes shift, in part in response to organized social
movements. But I have also evoked these historical campaigns because
they all targeted some expression of racism. U.S. chattel slavery was a
system of forced labor that relied on racist ideas and beliefs to
justify the relegation of people of African descent to the legal status
of property. Lynching was an extralegal institution that surrendered
thousands of African-American lives to the violence of ruthless racist
mobs. Under segregation, black people were legally declared second-class
citizens, for whom voting, job, education, and housing rights were
drastically curtailed, if they were available at all.

What is the relationship between these historical expressions of racism
and the role of the prison system today? Exploring such connections may
offer us a different perspective on the current state of the punishment
industry. If we are already persuaded that racism should not be allowed
to define the planet’s future and if we can successfully argue that
prisons are racist institutions, this may lead us to take seriously the
prospect of declaring prisons obsolete.

For the moment I am concentrating on the history of antiblack racism in
order to make the point that the prison reveals congealed forms of
antiblack racism that operate in clandestine ways. In other words, they
are rarely recognized as racist. But there are other racialized
histories that have affected the development of the U.S. punishment
system as
well—the histories of Latinos, Native Americans, and Asian-Americans.
These racisms also congeal and combine in the prison. Because we are so
accustomed to talking about race in terms of black and white, we often
fail to recognize and contest expressions of racism that target people
of color who are not black. Consider the mass arrests and detention of
people of Middle Eastern, South Asian, or Muslim heritage in the
aftermath of the September 11, 2001 attacks on the Pentagon and World
Trade Center.

This leads us to two important questions: Are prisons racist
institutions? Is racism so deeply entrenched in the institution of the
prison that it is not possible to eliminate one without eliminating the
other? These are questions that we should keep in mind as we examine the
historical links between U.S. slavery and the early penitentiary system.
The penitentiary as an institution that simultaneously punished and
rehabilitated its inhabitants was a new system of punishment that first
made its appearance in the United States around the time of the American
Revolution. This new system was based on the replacement of capital and
corporal punishment by incarceration.

Imprisonment itself was new neither to the United States nor to the
world, but until the creation of this new institution called the
penitentiary, it served as a prelude to punishment. People who were to
be subjected to some form of corporal punishment were detained in prison
until the execution of the punishment. With the penitentiary,
incarceration became the punishment itself. As is indicated in the
designation “penitentiary,” imprisonment was regarded as rehabilitative
and the penitentiary prison was devised to provide convicts with the
conditions for reflecting on their crimes and, through penitence, for
reshaping their habits and even their souls. Although some antislavery
advocates spoke out
against this new system of punishment during the revolutionary period,
the penitentiary was generally viewed as a progressive reform, linked to
the larger campaign for the rights of citizens.

In many ways, the penitentiary _was_ a vast improvement over the many
forms of capital and corporal punishment inherited from the English.
However, the contention that prisoners would refashion themselves if
only given the opportunity to reflect and labor in solitude and silence
disregarded the impact of authoritarian regimes of living and work.
Indeed, there were significant similarities between slavery and the
penitentiary prison. Historian Adam Jay Hirsch has pointed out:

One may perceive in the penitentiary many reflections of chattel slavery
as it was practiced in the South. Both institutions subordinated their
subjects to the will of others. Like Southern slaves, prison inmates
followed a daily routine specified by their superiors. Both institutions
reduced their subjects to dependence on others for the supply of basic
human services such as food and shelter. Both isolated their subjects
from the general population by confining them to a fixed habitat. And
both frequently coerced their subjects to work, often for longer hours
and for less compensation than free laborers.¹⁶

As Hirsch has observed, both institutions deployed similar forms of
punishment, and prison regulations were, in fact, very similar to the
Slave Codes—the laws that deprived enslaved human beings of virtually
all rights. Moreover, both prisoners and slaves were considered to have
pronounced proclivities to crime. People sentenced to the penitentiary
in
the North, white and black alike, were popularly represented as having a
strong kinship to enslaved black people.¹⁷

The ideologies governing slavery and those governing punishment were
profoundly linked during the earliest period of U.S. history. While free
people could be legally sentenced to punishment by hard labor, such a
sentence would in no way change the conditions of existence already
experienced by slaves. Thus, as Hirsch further reveals, Thomas
Jefferson, who supported the sentencing of convicted people to hard
labor on road and water projects, also pointed out that he would exclude
slaves from this sort of punishment. Since slaves already performed hard
labor, sentencing them to penal labor would not mark a difference in
their condition. Jefferson suggested banishment to other countries
instead.¹⁸

Particularly in the United States, race has always played a central role
in constructing presumptions of criminality. After the abolition of
slavery, former slave states passed new legislation revising the Slave
Codes in order to regulate the behavior of free blacks in ways similar
to those that had existed during slavery. The new Black Codes proscribed
a range of actions—such as vagrancy, absence from work, breach of job
contracts, the possession of firearms, and insulting gestures or
acts—that were criminalized only when the person charged was black. With
the passage of the Thirteenth Amendment to the Constitution, slavery and
involuntary servitude were putatively abolished. However, there was a
significant exception. In the wording of the amendment, slavery and
involuntary servitude were abolished “except as a punishment for crime,
whereof the party shall have been duly convicted.” According to the
Black Codes, there were crimes defined by state law for which only black
people could be “duly convicted.” Thus, former
slaves, who had recently been extricated from a condition of hard labor
for life, could be legally sentenced to penal servitude.

In the immediate aftermath of slavery, the southern states hastened to
develop a criminal justice system that could legally restrict the
possibilities of freedom for newly released slaves. Black people became
the prime targets of a developing convict lease system, referred to by
many as a reincarnation of slavery. The Mississippi Black Codes, for
example, declared vagrant “anyone/who was guilty of theft, had run away
[from a job, apparently], was drunk, was wanton in conduct or speech,
had neglected job or family, handled money carelessly, and . . . all
other idle and disorderly persons.”¹⁹ Thus, vagrancy was coded as a
black crime, one punishable by incarceration and forced labor, sometimes
on the very plantations that previously had thrived on slave labor.

Mary Ellen Curtin’s study of Alabama prisoners during the decades
following emancipation discloses that before the four hundred thousand
black slaves in that state were set free, ninety-nine percent of
prisoners in Alabama’s penitentiaries were white. As a consequence of
the shifts provoked by the institution of the Black Codes, within a
short period of time, the overwhelming majority of Alabama’s convicts
were black.²⁰ She further observes:

Although the vast majority of Alabama’s antebellum prisoners were white,
the popular perception was that the South’s true criminals were its
black slaves. During the 1870s the growing number of black prisoners in
the South further buttressed the belief that African Americans were
inherently criminal and, in particular, prone to larceny.²¹

In 1883, Frederick Douglass had already written about the South’s
tendency to “impute crime to color.”²² When a particularly egregious
crime was committed, he noted, not only was guilt frequently assigned to
a black person regardless of the perpetrator’s race, but white men
sometimes sought to escape punishment by disguising themselves as black.
Douglass would later recount one such incident that took place in
Granger County, Tennessee, in which a man who appeared to be black was
shot while committing a robbery. The wounded man, however, was
discovered to be a respectable white citizen who had colored his face
black.

The above example from Douglass demonstrates how whiteness, in the words
of legal scholar Cheryl Harris, operates as property.²³ According to
Harris, the fact that white identity was possessed as property meant
that rights, liberties, and self-identity were affirmed for white
people, while being denied to black people. The latter’s only access to
whiteness was through “passing.” Douglass’s comments indicate how this
property interest in whiteness was easily reversed in schemes to deny
black people their rights to due process. Interestingly, cases similar
to the one Douglass discusses above emerged in the United States during
the 1990s: in Boston, Charles Stuart murdered his pregnant wife and
attempted to blame an anonymous black man, and in Union, South Carolina,
Susan Smith killed her children and claimed they had been abducted by a
black carjacker. The racialization of crime—the tendency to “impute
crime to color,” to use Frederick Douglass’s words—did not wither away
as the country became increasingly removed from slavery. Proof that
crime continues to be imputed to color resides in the many evocations of
“racial profiling” in our time. That it is possible to be targeted by
the police for no other reason than the color of one’s skin is not mere
speculation.
Police departments in major urban areas have admitted the existence of
formal procedures designed to maximize the numbers of African-Americans
and Latinos arrested—even in the absence of probable cause. In the
aftermath of the September 11 attacks, vast numbers of people of Middle
Eastern and South Asian heritage were arrested and detained by the
police agency known as Immigration and Naturalization Services (INS).
The INS is the federal agency that claims the largest number of armed
agents, even more than the FBI.²⁴

During the post-slavery era, as black people were integrated into
southern penal systems—and as the penal system became a system of penal
servitude—the punishments associated with slavery became further
incorporated into the penal system. “Whipping,” as Matthew Mancini has
observed, “was the preeminent form of punishment under slavery; and the
lash, along with the chain, became the very emblem of servitude for
slaves and prisoners.ʺ²⁵ As indicated above, black people were
imprisoned under the laws assembled in the various Black Codes of the
southern states, which, because they were rearticulations of the Slave
Codes, tended to racialize penality and link it closely with previous
regimes of slavery. The expansion of the convict lease system and the
county chain gang meant that the antebellum criminal justice system,
which focused far more intensely on black people than on whites, defined
southern criminal justice largely as a means of controlling black labor.
According to Mancini:

Among the multifarious debilitating legacies of slavery was the
conviction that blacks could only labor in a certain way—the way
experience had shown them to have labored in the past: in gangs,
subjected to constant supervision, and under the discipline of the lash.
Since these were the requisites of slavery, and since slaves were
blacks, Southern whites almost universally concluded that blacks could
not work unless subjected to such intense surveillance and discipline.²⁶

Scholars who have studied the convict lease system point out that in
many important respects, convict leasing was far worse than slavery, an
insight that can be gleaned from titles such as _One Dies, Get Another_
(by Mancini), _Worse Than Slavery_ (David Oshinsky’s work on Parchman
Prison)_,_²⁷ and _Twice the Work of Free Labor_ (Alex Lichtenstein’s
examination of the political economy of convict leasing)_._²⁸ Slave
owners may have been concerned for the survival of individual slaves,
who, after all, represented significant investments. Convicts, on the
other hand, were leased not as individuals, but as a group, and they
could be worked literally to death without affecting the profitability
of a convict crew.

According to descriptions by contemporaries, the conditions under which
leased convicts and county chain gangs lived were far worse than those
under which black people had lived as slaves. The records of Mississippi
plantations in the Yazoo Delta during the late 1880s indicate that

the prisoners ate and slept on bare ground, without blankets or
mattresses, and often without clothes. They were punished for “slow
hoeing” (ten lashes), “sorry planting” (five lashes), and “being light
with cotton” (five lashes). Some who attempted to escape were whipped
“till the blood ran down their legs”; others had a metal spur riveted to
their feet. Convicts dropped from exhaustion, pneumonia,
malaria, frostbite, consumption, sunstroke, dysentery, gunshot wounds,
and “shackle poisoning” (the constant rubbing of chains and leg irons
against bare flesh).²⁹

The appalling treatment to which convicts were subjected under the lease
system recapitulated and further extended the regimes of slavery. If, as
Adam Jay Hirsch contends, the early incarnations of the U.S.
penitentiary in the North tended to mirror the institution of slavery in
many important respects, the post-Civil War evolution of the punishment
system was in very literal ways the continuation of a slave system,
which was no longer legal in the “free” world. The population of
convicts, whose racial composition was dramatically transformed by the
abolition of slavery, could be subjected to such intense exploitation
and to such horrendous modes of punishment precisely because they
continued to be perceived as slaves.

Historian Mary Ann Curtin has observed that many scholars who have
acknowledged the deeply entrenched racism of the post-Civil War
structures of punishment in the South have failed to identify the extent
to which racism colored common-sense understandings of the circumstances
surrounding the wholesale criminalization of black communities. Even
antiracist historians, she contends, do not go far enough in examining
the ways in which black people were made into criminals. They point
out—and this, she says, is indeed partially true—that in the aftermath
of emancipation, large numbers of black people were forced by their new
social situation to steal in order to survive. It was the transformation
of petty thievery into a felony that relegated substantial numbers of
black people to the “involuntary servitude” legalized by the Thirteenth
Amendment. What Curtin suggests is that these
charges of theft were frequently fabricated outright. They “also served
as subterfuge for political revenge. After emancipation the courtroom
became an ideal place to exact racial retribution.” ³⁰ In this sense,
the work of the criminal justice system was intimately related to the
extralegal work of lynching.

Alex Lichtenstein, whose study focuses on the role of the convict lease
system in forging a new labor force for the South, identifies the lease
system, along with the new Jim Crow laws, as the central institution in
the development of a racial state.

New South capitalists in Georgia and elsewhere were able to use the
state to recruit and discipline a convict labor force, and thus were
able to develop their states’ resources without creating a wage labor
force, and without undermining planters’ control of black labor. In
fact, quite the opposite: the penal system could be used as a powerful
sanction against rural blacks who challenged the racial order upon which
agricultural labor control relied.³¹

Lichtenstein discloses, for example, the extent to which the building of
Georgia railroads during the nineteenth century relied on black convict
labor. He further reminds us that as we drive down the most famous
street in Atlanta—Peachtree Street—we ride on the backs of convicts:
“[T]he renowned Peachtree Street and the rest of Atlanta’s well-paved
roads and modern transportation infrastructure, which helped cement its
place as the commercial hub of the modern South, were originally laid by
convicts.”³²

Lichtenstein’s major argument is that the convict lease was not an
irrational regression; it was not primarily a throwback to precapitalist
modes of production. Rather, it
was a most efficient and most rational deployment of racist strategies
to swiftly achieve industrialization in the South. In this sense, he
argues, “convict labor was in many ways in the vanguard of the region’s
first tentative, ambivalent, steps toward modernity.ʺ³³

Those of us who have had the opportunity to visit nineteenth-century
mansions that were originally constructed on slave plantations are
rarely content with an aesthetic appraisal of these structures, no
matter how beautiful they may be. Sufficient visual imagery of toiling
black slaves circulate enough in our environment for us to imagine the
brutality that hides just beneath the surface of these wondrous
mansions. We have learned how to recognize the role of slave labor, as
well as the racism it embodied. But black convict labor remains a hidden
dimension of our history. It is extremely unsettling to think of modern,
industrialized urban areas as having been originally produced under the
racist labor conditions of penal servitude that are often described by
historians as even worse than slavery.

I grew up in the city of Birmingham, Alabama. Because of its mines—coal
and iron ore—and its steel mills that remained active until the
deindustrialization process of the 1980s, it was widely known as “the
Pittsburgh of the South.” The fathers of many of my friends worked in
these mines and mills. It is only recently that I have learned that the
black miners and steelworkers I knew during my childhood inherited their
place in Birmingham’s industrial development from black convicts forced
to do this work under the lease system. As Curtin observes,

Many ex-prisoners became miners because Alabama used prison labor
extensively in its coalmines. By 1888 all of Alabama’s able male
prisoners were leased
to two major mining companies: the Tennessee Coal and Iron Company (TCI)
and Sloss Iron and Steel Company. For a charge of up to $18.50 per month
per man, these corporations “leased,” or rented prison laborers and
worked them in coalmines.³⁴

Learning about this little-acknowledged dimension of black and labor
history has caused me to reevaluate my own childhood experiences.

One of the many ruses racism achieves is the virtual erasure of
historical contributions by people of color. Here we have a penal system
that was racist in many respects—discriminatory arrests and sentences,
conditions of work, modes of punishment—together with the racist erasure
of the significant contributions made by black convicts as a result of
racist coercion. Just as it is difficult to imagine how much is owed to
convicts relegated to penal servitude during the nineteenth and
twentieth centuries, we find it difficult today to feel a connection
with the prisoners who produce a rising number of commodities that we
take for granted in our daily lives. In the state of California, public
colleges and universities are provided with furniture produced by
prisoners, the vast majority of whom are Latino and black.

There are aspects of our history that we need to interrogate and
rethink, the recognition of which may help us to adopt more complicated,
critical postures toward the present and the future. I have focused on
the work of a few scholars whose work urges us to raise questions about
the past, present, and future. Curtin, for example, is not simply
content with offering us the possibility of reexamining the place of
mining and steelwork in the lives of black people in Alabama. She also
uses her research to urge us to think about the uncanny parallels
between the convict lease system
in the nineteenth century and prison privatization in the twenty-first.

In the late nineteenth century, coal companies wished to keep their
skilled prison laborers for as long as they could, leading to denials of
“short time.” Today, a slightly different economic incentive can lead to
similar consequences. CCA [Corrections Corporation of America] is paid
per prisoner. If the supply dries up, or too many are released too
early, their profits are affected . . . Longer prison terms mean greater
profits, but the larger point is that the profit motive promotes the
expansion of imprisonment.³⁵

The persistence of the prison as the main form of punishment, with its
racist and sexist dimensions, has created this historical continuity
between the nineteenth- and early-twentieth-century convict lease system
and the privatized prison business today. While the convict lease system
was legally abolished, its structures of exploitation have reemerged in
the patterns of privatization, and, more generally, in the wide-ranging
corporatization of punishment that has produced a prison industrial
complex. If the prison continues to dominate the landscape of punishment
throughout this century and into the next, what might await coming
generations of impoverished African-Americans, Latinos, Native
Americans, and Asian-Americans? Given the parallels between the prison
and slavery, a productive exercise might consist in speculating about
what the present might look like if slavery or its successor, the
convict lease system, had not been abolished.

To be sure, I am not suggesting that the abolition of slavery
and the lease system has produced an era of equality and justice. On the
contrary, racism surreptitiously defines social and economic structures
in ways that are difficult to identify and thus are much more damaging.
In some states, for example, more than one-third of black men have been
labeled felons. In Alabama and Florida, once a felon, always a felon,
which entails the loss of status as a rights-bearing citizen. One of the
grave consequences of the powerful reach of the prison was the 2000
(s)election of George W. Bush as president. If only the black men and
women denied the right to vote because of an actual or presumed felony
record had been allowed to cast their ballots, Bush would not be in the
White House today. And perhaps we would not be dealing with the awful
costs of the War on Terrorism declared during the first year of his
administration. If not for his election, the people of Iraq might not
have suffered death, destruction, and environmental poisoning by U.S.
military forces.

As appalling as the current political situation may be, imagine what our
lives might have become if we were still grappling with the institution
of slavery—or the convict lease system or racial segregation. But we do
not have to speculate about living with the consequences of the prison.
There is more than enough evidence in the lives of men and women who
have been claimed by ever more repressive institutions and who are
denied access to their families, their communities, to educational
opportunities, to productive and creative work, to physical and mental
recreation. And there is even more compelling evidence about the damage
wrought by the expansion of the prison system in the schools located in
poor communities of color that replicate the structures and regimes of
the prison. When children attend schools that place a greater value on
discipline and security than on knowledge and intellectual development,
they are attending prep schools for prison. If this is the predicament
we face today, what might the future hold if the prison system acquires
an even greater presence in our society? In the nineteenth century,
antislavery activists insisted that as long as slavery continued, the
future of democracy was bleak indeed. In the twenty-first century,
antiprison activists insist that a fundamental requirement for the
revitalization of democracy is the long-overdue abolition of the prison
system.

3

IMPRISONMENT AND REFORM

“One should recall that the movement for reforming the prisons, for
controlling their functioning is not a recent phenomenon. It does not
even seem to have originated in a recognition of failure. Prison
‘reform’ is virtually contemporary with the prison itself: it
constitutes, as it were, its programme.”

—Michel Foucault³⁶

 

It is ironic that the prison itself was a product of concerted efforts
by reformers to create a better system of punishment. If the words
“prison reform” so easily slip from our lips, it is because “prison” and
“reform” have been inextricably linked since the beginning of the use of
imprisonment as the main means of punishing those who violate social
norms. As I have already indicated, the origins of the prison are
associated with the American Revolution and therefore with the
resistance to the colonial power of England. Today this seems ironic,
but incarceration within a penitentiary was assumed to be humane—at
least far more humane than the capital and corporal punishment inherited
from England and other European countries. Foucault opens his study,
_Discipline and Punish: The Birth of the Prison,_ with a graphic
description of a 1757 execution in Paris. The man who was put to death
was first forced to undergo a series of formidable tortures ordered by
the court. Red-hot pincers were
used to burn away the flesh from his limbs, and molten lead, boiling
oil, burning resin, and other substances were melted together and poured
onto the wounds. Finally, he was drawn and quartered, his body burned,
and the ashes tossed into the wind.³⁷ Under English common law, a
conviction for sodomy led to the punishment of being buried alive, and
convicted heretics also were burned alive. “The crime of treason by a
female was punished initially under the common law by burning alive the
defendant. However, in the year 1790 this method was halted and the
punishment became strangulation and burning of the corpse.ʺ³⁸

European and American reformers set out to end macabre penalties such as
this, as well as other forms of corporal punishment such as the stocks
and pillories, whippings, brandings, and amputations. Prior to the
appearance of punitive incarceration, such punishment was designed to
have its most profound effect not so much on the person punished as on
the crowd of spectators. Punishment was, in essence, public spectacle.
Reformers such as John Howard in England and Benjamin Rush in
Pennsylvania argued that punishment—if carried out in isolation, behind
the walls of the prison—would cease to be revenge and would actually
reform those who had broken the law.

It should also be pointed out that punishment has not been without its
gendered dimensions. Women were often punished within the domestic
domain, and instruments of torture were sometimes imported by
authorities into the household. In seventeenth-century Britain, women
whose husbands identified them as quarrelsome and unaccepting of male
dominance were punished by means of a gossip’s bridle, or “branks,” a
headpiece with a chain attached and an iron bit that was introduced into
the woman’s mouth.³⁹ Although the branking of women was often linked to
a public parade, this
contraption was sometimes hooked to a wall of the house, where the
punished woman remained until her husband decided to release her. I
mention these forms of punishment inflicted on women because, like the
punishment inflicted on slaves, they were rarely taken up by prison
reformers.

Other modes of punishment that predated the rise of the prison include
banishment, forced labor in galleys, transportation, and appropriation
of the accused’s property. The punitive transportation of large numbers
of people from England, for example, facilitated the initial
colonization of Australia. Transported English convicts also settled the
North American colony of Georgia. During the early 1700s, one in eight
transported convicts were women, and the work they were forced to
perform often consisted of prostitution.⁴⁰

Imprisonment was not employed as a principal mode of punishment until
the eighteenth century in Europe and the nineteenth century in the
United States. And European prison systems were instituted in Asia and
Africa as an important component of colonial rule. In India, for
example, the English prison system was introduced during the second half
of the eighteenth century, when jails were established in the regions of
Calcutta and Madras. In Europe, the penitentiary movement against
capital and other corporal punishments reflected new intellectual
tendencies associated with the Enlightenment, activist interventions by
Protestant reformers, and structural transformations associated with the
rise of industrial capitalism. In Milan in 1764, Cesare Beccaria
published his _Essay on Crimes and Punishments,_⁴¹ which was strongly
influenced by notions of equality advanced by the philosophes—especially
Voltaire, Rousseau, and Montesquieu. Beccaria argued that punishment
should never be a private matter, nor should it be arbitrarily violent;
rather, it should be public, swift, and as
lenient as possible. He revealed the contradiction of what was then a
distinctive feature of imprisonment—the fact that it was generally
imposed prior to the defendant’s guilt or innocence being decided.

However, incarceration itself eventually became the penalty, bringing
about a distinction between imprisonment as punishment and pretrial
detention or detention until the infliction of punishment. The process
through which imprisonment developed into the primary mode of
state-inflicted punishment was very much related to the rise of
capitalism and to the appearance of a new set of ideological conditions.
These new conditions reflected the rise of the bourgeoisie as the social
class whose interests and aspirations furthered new scientific,
philosophical, cultural, and popular ideas. It is thus important to
grasp the fact that the prison as we know it today did not make its
appearance on the historical stage as the superior form of punishment
for all times. It was simply—though we should not underestimate the
complexity of this process—what made most sense at a particular moment
in history. We should therefore question whether a system that was
intimately related to a particular set of historical circumstances that
prevailed during the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries can lay
absolute claim on the twenty-first century.

It may be important at this point in our examination to acknowledge the
radical shift in the social perception of the individual that appeared
in the ideas of that era. With the rise of the bourgeoisie, the
individual came to be regarded as a bearer of formal rights and
liberties. The notion of the individual’s inalienable rights and
liberties was eventually memorialized in the French and American
Revolution. _“Liberté, Egalité, Fraternité”_ from the French Revolution
and “We hold these truths to be self-evident: all men are created
equal . . .” from the American Revolution were new and radical ideas,
even though they were not extended to women, workers, Africans, and
Indians. Before the acceptance of the sanctity of individual rights,
imprisonment could not have been understood as punishment. If the
individual was not perceived as possessing inalienable rights and
liberties, then the alienation of those rights and liberties by removal
from society to a space tyrannically governed by the state would not
have made sense. Banishment beyond the geographical limits of the town
may have made sense, but not the alteration of the individual’s legal
status through imposition of a prison sentence.

Moreover, the prison sentence, which is always computed in terms of
time, is related to abstract quantification, evoking the rise of science
and what is often referred to as the Age of Reason. We should keep in
mind that this was precisely the historical period when the value of
labor began to be calculated in terms of time and therefore compensated
in another quantifiable way, by money. The computability of state
punishment in terms of time—days, months, years—resonates with the role
of labor-time as the basis for computing the value of capitalist
commodities. Marxist theorists of punishment have noted that precisely
the historical period during which the commodity form arose is the era
during which penitentiary sentences emerged as the primary form of
punishment.⁴²

Today, the growing social movement contesting the supremacy of global
capital is a movement that directly challenges the rule of the
planet—its human, animal, and plant populations, as well as its natural
resources—by corporations that are primarily interested in the increased
production and circulation of ever more profitable commodities. This is
a challenge to the supremacy of the commodity form, a rising
resistance to the contemporary tendency to commodify every aspect of
planetary existence. The question we might consider is whether this new
resistance to capitalist globalization should also incorporate
resistance to the prison.

Thus far I have largely used gender-neutral language to describe the
historical development of the prison and its reformers. But convicts
punished by imprisonment in emergent penitentiary systems were primarily
male. This reflected the deeply gender-biased structure of legal,
political, and economic rights. Since women were largely denied public
status as rights-bearing individuals, they could not be easily punished
by the deprivation of such rights through imprisonment. ⁴³ This was
especially true of married women, who had no standing before the law.
According to English common law, marriage resulted in a state of “civil
death,” as symbolized by the wife’s assumption of the husband’s name.
Consequently, she tended to be punished for revolting against her
domestic duties rather than for failure in her meager public
responsibilities. The relegation of white women to domestic economies
prevented them from playing a significant role in the emergent commodity
realm. This was especially true since wage labor was typically gendered
as male and racialized as white. It is not fortuitous that domestic
corporal punishment for women survived long after these modes of
punishment had become obsolete for (white) men. The persistence of
domestic violence painfully attests to these historical modes of
gendered punishment.

Some scholars have argued that the word “penitentiary” may have been
used first in connection with plans outlined in England in 1758 to house
“penitent prostitutes.” In 1777, John Howard, the leading Protestant
proponent of penal reform in England, published _The State of the
Prisons,_⁴⁴ in which he conceptualized imprisonment as an occasion for
religious self-reflection and self-reform. Between 1787 and 1791, the
utilitarian philosopher Jeremy Bentham published his letters on a prison
model he called the panopticon.⁴⁵ Bentham claimed that criminals could
only internalize productive labor habits if they were under constant
surveillance. According to his panopticon model, prisoners were to be
housed in single cells on circular tiers, all facing a multilevel guard
tower. By means of blinds and a complicated play of light and darkness,
the prisoners—who would not see each other at all—would be unable to see
the warden. From his vantage point, on the other hand, the warden would
be able to see all of the prisoners. However—and this was the most
significant aspect of Bentham’s mammoth panopticon—because each
individual prisoner would never be able to determine where the warden’s
gaze was focused, each prisoner would be compelled to act, that is,
work, as if he were being watched at all times.

If we combine Howard’s emphasis on disciplined self-reflection with
Bentham’s ideas regarding the technology of internalization designed to
make surveillance and discipline the purview of the individual prisoner,
we can begin to see how such a conception of the prison had far-reaching
implications. The conditions of possibility for this new form of
punishment were strongly anchored in a historical era during which the
working class needed to be constituted as an army of self-disciplined
individuals capable of performing the requisite industrial labor for a
developing capitalist system.

John Howard’s ideas were incorporated in the Penitentiary Act of 1799,
which opened the way for the modern prison. While Jeremy Bentham’s ideas
influenced the development of the first national English penitentiary,
located in Millbank and opened in 1816, the first full-fledged effort to
create a panopticon prison was in the United States.
The Western State Penitentiary in Pittsburgh, based on a revised
architectural model of the panopticon, opened in 1826. But the
penitentiary had already made its appearance in the United States.
Pennsylvania’s Walnut Street Jail housed the first state penitentiary in
the United States, when a portion of the jail was converted in 1790 from
a detention facility to an institution housing convicts whose prison
sentences simultaneously became punishment and occasions for penitence
and reform.

Walnut Street’s austere regime—total isolation in single cells where
prisoners lived, ate, worked, read the Bible (if, indeed, they were
literate), and supposedly reflected and repented—came to be known as the
Pennsylvania system. This regime would constitute one of that era’s two
major models of imprisonment. Although the other model, developed in
Auburn, New York, was viewed as a rival to the Pennsylvania system, the
philosophical basis of the two models did not differ substantively. The
Pennsylvania model, which eventually crystallized in the Eastern State
Penitentiary in Cherry Hill—the plans for which were approved in
1821—emphasized total isolation, silence, and solitude, whereas the
Auburn model called for solitary cells but labor in common. This mode of
prison labor, which was called congregate, was supposed to unfold in
total silence. Prisoners were allowed to be with each other as they
worked, but only under condition of silence. Because of its more
efficient labor practices, Auburn eventually became the dominant model,
both for the United States and Europe.

Why would eighteenth- and nineteenth-century reformers become so
invested in creating conditions of punishment based on solitary
confinement? Today, aside from death, solitary confinement—next to
torture, or as a form of torture—is considered the worst form of
punishment imaginable.
Then, however, it was assumed to have an emancipatory effect. The body
was placed in conditions of segregation and solitude in order to allow
the soul to flourish. It is not accidental that most of the reformers of
that era were deeply religious and therefore saw the architecture and
regimes of the penitentiary as emulating the architecture and regimes of
monastic life. Still, observers of the new penitentiary saw, early on,
the real potential for insanity in solitary confinement. In an
often-quoted passage of his _American Notes_, Charles Dickens prefaced a
description of his 1842 visit to Eastern Penitentiary with the
observation that “the system here is rigid, strict, and hopeless
solitary confinement. I believe it, in its effects, to be cruel and
wrong.”

In its intention I am well convinced that it is kind, humane, and meant
for reformation; but I am persuaded that those who devised this system
of Prison Discipline, and those benevolent gentlemen who carry it into
execution, do not know what it is that they are doing. I believe that
very few men are capable of estimating the immense amount of torture and
agony that this dreadful punishment, prolonged for years, inflicts upon
the sufferers . . . I am only the more convinced that there is a depth
of terrible endurance in it which none but the sufferers themselves can
fathom, and which no man has a right to inflict upon his
fellow-creature. I hold this slow and daily tampering with the mysteries
of the brain to be immeasurably worse than any torture of the body . . .
because its wounds are not upon the surface, and it extorts few cries
that human ears can hear; therefore I the more denounce it, as a secret
punishment which slumbering humanity is not roused up to stay.⁴⁶

Unlike other Europeans such as Alexis de Tocqueville and Gustave de
Beaumont, who believed that such punishment would result in moral
renewal and thus mold convicts into better citizens,⁴⁷ Dickens was of
the opinion that “[t]hose who have undergone this punishment MUST pass
into society again morally unhealthy and diseased.”⁴⁸ This early
critique of the penitentiary and its regime of solitary confinement
troubles the notion that imprisonment is the most suitable form of
punishment for a democratic society.

The current construction and expansion of state and federal
super-maximum security prisons, whose putative purpose is to address
disciplinary problems within the penal system, draws upon the historical
conception of the penitentiary, then considered the most progressive
form of punishment. Today African-Americans and Latinos are vastly
overrepresented in these supermax prisons and control units, the first
of which emerged when federal correctional authorities began to send
prisoners housed throughout the system whom they deemed to be
“dangerous” to the federal prison in Marion, Illinois. In 1983, the
entire prison was “locked down,” which meant that prisoners were
confined to their cells twenty-three hours a day. This lockdown became
permanent, thus furnishing the general model for the control unit and
supermax prison.⁴⁹ Today, there are approximately sixty super-maximum
security federal and state prisons located in thirty-six states and many
more supermax units in virtually every state in the country.

A description of supermaxes in a 1997 Human Rights Watch report sounds
chillingly like Dickens’s description of Eastern State Penitentiary.
What is different, however, is that all references to individual
rehabilitation have disappeared.

Inmates in super-maximum security facilities are usually held in single
cell lock-down, commonly referred to as solitary confinement . . .
[C]ongregate activities with other prisoners are usually prohibited;
other prisoners cannot even be seen from an inmate’s cell; communication
with other prisoners is prohibited or difficult (consisting, for
example, of shouting from cell to cell); visiting and telephone
privileges are limited.⁵⁰

The new generation of super-maximum security facilities also rely on
state-of-the-art technology for monitoring and controlling prisoner
conduct and movement, utilizing, for example, video monitors and
remote-controlled electronic doors.⁵¹ “These prisons represent the
application of sophisticated, modern technology dedicated entirely to
the task of social control, and they isolate, regulate and surveil more
effectively than anything that has preceded them.”⁵²

I have highlighted the similarities between the early U.S.
penitentiary—with its aspirations toward individual rehabilitation—and
the repressive supermaxes of our era as a reminder of the mutability of
history. What was once regarded as progressive and even revolutionary
represents today the marriage of technological superiority and political
backwardness. No one—not even the most ardent defenders of the
supermax—would try to argue today that absolute segregation, including
sensory deprivation, is restorative and healing. The prevailing
justification for the supermax is that the horrors it creates are the
perfect complement for the horrifying personalities deemed the worst of
the worst by the prison system. In other words, there is no pretense
that rights are respected, there is no concern for the individual, there
is no sense that men and women incarcerated in supermaxes
deserve anything approaching respect and comfort. According to a 1999
report issued by the National Institute of Corrections,

Generally, the overall constitutionality of these [supermax] programs
remains unclear. As larger numbers of inmates with a greater diversity
of characteristics, backgrounds, and behaviors are incarcerated in these
facilities, the likelihood of legal challenge is increased.⁵³

During the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries, absolute solitude and
strict regimentation of the prisoner’s every action were viewed as
strategies for transforming habits and ethics. That is to say, the idea
that imprisonment should be the main form of punishment reflected a
belief in the potential of white mankind for progress, not only in
science and industry, but at the level of the individual member of
society as well. Prison reformers mirrored Enlightenment assumptions of
progress in every aspect of human—or to be more precise, white
Western—society. In his 1987 study _Imagining the Penitentiary: Fiction
and the Architecture of Mind in Eighteenth-Century England_, John Bender
proposes the very intriguing argument that the emergent literary genre
of the novel furthered a discourse of progress and individual
transformation that encouraged attitudes toward punishment to change.⁵⁴
These attitudes, he suggests, heralded the conception and construction
of penitentiary prisons during the latter part of the eighteenth century
as a reform suited to the capacities of those who were deemed human.

Reformers who called for the imposition of penitentiary architecture and
regimes on the then existing structure of the prison aimed their
critiques at the prisons that were primarily
used for purposes of pretrial detention or as an alternative punishment
for those who were unable to pay fines exacted by the courts. John
Howard, the most well known of these reformers, was what you might today
call a prison activist. Beginning in 1773, at the age of forty-seven, he
initiated a series of visits that took him “to every institution for the
poor in Europe . . . [a campaign] which cost him his fortune and finally
his life in a typhus war of the Russian army at

Cherson in 1791.”⁵⁵ At the conclusion of his first trip abroad, he
successfully ran for the office of sheriff in Bedfordshire. As sheriff
he investigated the prisons under his own jurisdiction and later “set
out to visit every prison in England and Wales to document the evils he
had first observed at Bedford.”⁵⁶

Bender argues that the novel helped facilitate these campaigns to
transform the old prisons—which were filthy and in disarray, and which
thrived on the bribery of the wardens—into well-ordered rehabilitative
penitentiaries. He shows that novels such as _Moll Flanders_ and
_Robinson Crusoe_ emphasized “the power of confinement to reshape
personalityʺ⁵⁷ and popularized some of the ideas that moved reformers to
action. As Bender points out, the eighteenth-century reformers
criticized the old prisons for their chaos, their lack of organization
and classification, for the easy circulation of alcohol and prostitution
they permitted, and for the prevalence of contagion and disease.

The reformers, primarily Protestant, among whom Quakers were especially
dominant, couched their ideas in large part in religious frameworks.
Though John Howard was not himself a Quaker—he was an independent
Protestant—nevertheless

[h]e was drawn to Quaker asceticism and adopted the dress “of a plain
Friend.” His own brand of piety
was strongly reminiscent of the Quaker traditions of silent prayer,
“suffering” introspection, and faith in the illumining power of God’s
light. Quakers, for their part, were bound to be drawn to the idea of
imprisonment as a purgatory, as a forced withdrawal from the
distractions of the senses into silent and solitary confrontation with
the self. Howard conceived of a convict’s process of reformation in
terms similar to the spiritual awakening of a believer at a Quaker
meeting.⁵⁸

However, according to Michael Ignatieff, Howard’s contributions did not
so much reside in the religiosity of his reform efforts.

The originality of Howard’s indictment lies in its “scientific,” not in
its moral character. Elected a Fellow of the Royal Society in 1756 and
author of several scientific papers on climatic variations in
Bedfordshire, Howard was one of the first philanthropists to attempt a
systematic statistical description of a social problem.⁵⁹

Likewise, Bender’s analysis of the relationship between the novel and
the penitentiary emphasizes the extent to which the philosophical
underpinnings of the prison reformer’s campaigns echoed the materialism
and utilitarianism of the English Enlightenment. The campaign to reform
the prisons was a project to impose order, classification, cleanliness,
good work habits, and self-consciousness. He argues that people detained
within the old prisons were not severely restricted—they sometimes even
enjoyed the freedom to move in and out of the prison. They were not
compelled to work and, depending on their own resources, could eat and
drink as they wished. Even sex was sometimes available, as prostitutes
were sometimes allowed temporary entrance into the prisons. Howard and
other reformers called for the imposition of rigid rules that would
“enforce solitude and penitence, cleanliness and work.”⁶⁰

“The new penitentiaries,” according to Bender, “supplanting both the old
prisons and houses of correction, explicitly reached toward . . . three
goals: maintenance of order within a largely urban labor force,
salvation of the soul, and rationalization of personality.”⁶¹ He argues
that this is precisely what was narratively accomplished by the novel.
It ordered and classified social life, it represented individuals as
conscious of their surroundings and as self-aware and self-fashioning.
Bender thus sees a kinship between two major developments of the
eighteenth century—the rise of the novel in the cultural sphere and the
rise of the penitentiary in the socio-legal sphere. If the novel as a
cultural form helped to produce the penitentiary, then prison reformers
must have been influenced by the ideas generated by and through the
eighteenth-century novel.

Literature has continued to play a role in campaigns around the prison.
During the twentieth century, prison writing, in particular, has
periodically experienced waves of popularity. The public recognition of
prison writing in the United States has historically coincided with the
influence of social movements calling for prison reform and/or
abolition. Robert Burns’s _I Am a Fugitive from a Georgia Chain Gang_,⁶²
and the 1932 Hollywood film upon which it was based, played a central
role in the campaign to abolish the chain gang. During the 1970s, which
were marked by intense organizing within, outside, and across prison
walls, numerous works authored by prisoners followed the 1970
publication
of George Jackson’s _Soledad Brother_⁶³ and the anthology I coedited
with Bettina Aptheker, _If They Come in the Morning_.⁶⁴ While many
prison writers during that era had discovered the emancipatory potential
of writing on their own, relying either on the education they had
received prior to their imprisonment or on their tenacious efforts at
self-education, others pursued their writing as a direct result of the
expansion of prison educational programs during that era.

Mumia Abu-Jamal, who has challenged the contemporary dismantling of
prison education programs, asks in _Live from Death Row,_

What societal interest is served by prisoners who remain illiterate?
What social benefit is there in ignorance? How are people corrected
while imprisoned if their education is outlawed? Who profits (other than
the prison establishment itself) from stupid prisoners?⁶⁵

A practicing journalist before his arrest in 1982 on charges of killing
Philadelphia policeman Daniel Faulkner, Abu-Jamal has regularly produced
articles on capital punishment, focusing especially on its racial and
class disproportions. His ideas have helped to link critiques of the
death penalty with the more general challenges to the expanding U.S.
prison system and are particularly helpful to activists who seek to
associate death penalty abolitionism with prison abolitionism. His
prison writings have been published in both popular and scholarly
journals (such as _The Nation_ and _Yale Law Journal_) as well as in
three collections, _Live from Death Row, Death Blossoms,_⁶⁶ and _All
Things Censored._⁶⁷

Abu-Jamal and many other prison writers have strongly criticized the
prohibition of Pell Grants for prisoners, which
was enacted in the 1994 crime bill,⁶⁸ as indicative of the contemporary
pattern of dismantling educational programs behind bars. As creative
writing courses for prisoners were defunded, virtually every literary
journal publishing prisoners’ writing eventually collapsed. Of the
scores of magazines and newspapers produced behind walls, only the
_Angolite_ at Louisiana’s Angola Prison and _Prison Legal News_ at
Washington State Prison remain. What this means is that precisely at a
time of consolidating a significant writing culture behind bars,
repressive strategies are being deployed to dissuade prisoners from
educating themselves.

If the publication of Malcolm X’s autobiography marks a pivotal moment
in the development of prison literature and a moment of vast promise for
prisoners who try to make education a major dimension of their time
behind bars,⁶⁹ contemporary prison practices are systematically dashing
those hopes. In the 1950s, Malcolm’s prison education was a dramatic
example of prisoners’ ability to turn their incarceration into a
transformative experience. With no available means of organizing his
quest for knowledge, he proceeded to read a dictionary, copying each
word in his own hand. By the time he could immerse himself in reading,
he noted, “months passed without my even thinking about being
imprisoned. In fact, up to then, I never had been so truly free in my
life.ʺ⁷⁰ Then, according to Malcolm, prisoners who demonstrated an
unusual interest in reading were assumed to have embarked upon a journey
of self-rehabilitation and were frequently allowed special
privileges—such as checking out more than the maximum number of books.
Even so, in order to pursue this self-education, Malcolm had to work
against the prison regime—he often read on his cell floor, long after
lights-out, by the glow of the corridor light, taking care to return to
bed each
hour for the two minutes during which the guard marched past his cell.

The contemporary disestablishment of writing and other prison
educational programs is indicative of the official disregard today for
rehabilitative strategies, particularly those that encourage individual
prisoners to acquire autonomy of the mind. The documentary film _The
Last Graduation_ describes the role prisoners played in establishing a
four-year college program at New York’s Greenhaven Prison and,
twenty-two years later, the official decision to dismantle it. According
to Eddie Ellis, who spent twenty-five years in prison and is currently a
well-known leader of the antiprison movement, “As a result of Attica,
college programs came into the prisons.ʺ⁷¹

In the aftermath of the 1971 prisoner rebellion at Attica and the
government-sponsored massacre, public opinion began to favor prison
reform. Forty-three Attica prisoners and eleven guards and civilians
were killed by the National Guard, who had been ordered to retake the
prison by Governor Nelson Rockefeller. The leaders of the prison
rebellion had been very specific about their demands. In their
“practical demands” they expressed concerns about diet, improvement in
the quality of guards, more realistic rehabilitation programs, and
better education programs. They also wanted religious freedom, freedom
to engage in political activity, and an end to censorship—all of which
they saw as indispensable to their educational needs. As Eddie Ellis
observes in _The Last Graduation_,

Prisoners very early recognized the fact that they needed to be better
educated, that the more education they had, the better they would be
able to deal with themselves and their problems, the problems
of the prisons and the problems of the communities from which most of
them came.

Lateef Islam, another former prisoner featured in this documentary,
said, “We held classes before the college came. We taught each other,
and sometimes under penalty of a beat-up.”

After the Attica Rebellion, more than five hundred prisoners were
transferred to Greenhaven, including some of the leaders who continued
to press for educational programs. As a direct result of their demands,
Marist College, a New York state college near Greenhaven, began to offer
college-level courses in 1973 and eventually established the
infrastructure for an on-site four-year college program. The program
thrived for twenty-two years. Some of the many prisoners who earned
their degrees at Greenhaven pursued postgraduate studies after their
release. As the documentary powerfully demonstrates, the program
produced dedicated men who left prison and offered their newly acquired
knowledge and skills to their communities on the outside.

In 1994, consistent with the general pattern of creating more prisons
and more repression within all prisons, Congress took up the question of
withdrawing college funding for inmates. The congressional debate
concluded with a decision to add an amendment to the 1994 crime bill
that eliminated all Pell Grants for prisoners, thus effectively
defunding all higher educational programs. After twenty-two years,
Marist College was compelled to terminate its program at Greenhaven
Prison. Thus, the documentary revolves around the very last graduation
ceremony on July 15, 1995, and the poignant process of removing the
books that, in many ways, symbolized the possibilities of freedom. Or,
as one of the Marist professors said, “They see books as
full of gold.” The prisoner who for many years had served as a clerk for
the college sadly reflected, as books were being moved, that there was
nothing left to do in prison—except perhaps bodybuilding. “But,” he
asked, “what’s the use of building your body if you can’t build your
mind?” Ironically, not long after educational programs were
disestablished, weights and bodybuilding equipment were also removed
from most U.S. prisons.

4

HOW GENDER STRUCTURES THE PRISON SYSTEM

“I have been told that I will never leave prison if I contin-
ue to fight the system. My answer is that one must be
alive in order to leave prison, and our current standard of
medical care is tantamount to a death sentence.
Therefore, I have no choice but to continue . . . Conditions
within the institution continually reinvoke memories of
violence and oppression, often with devastating results.
Unlike other incarcerated women who have come forward
to reveal their impressions of prison, I do not feel ‘safer’
here because ‘the abuse has stopped.’ _It has not stopped_. It
has shifted shape and paced itself differently, but it is as
insidious and pervasive in prison as ever it was in the
world I know outside these walls. What has ceased is my
ignorance of the facts concerning abuse—and my willing-
ness to tolerate it in silence.”

—Marcia Bunny⁷²

 

Over the last five years, the prison system has received far more
attention by the media than at any time since the period following the
1971 Attica Rebellion. However, with a few important exceptions, women
have been left out of the public discussions about the expansion of the
U.S. prison system. I am not suggesting that simply bringing women into
the existing conversations on jails and prisons will deepen
our analysis of state punishment and further the project of prison
abolition. Addressing issues that are specific to women’s prisons is of
vital importance, but it is equally important to shift the way we think
about the prison system as a whole. Certainly women’s prison practices
are gendered, but so, too, are men’s prison practices. To assume that
men’s institutions constitute the norm and women’s institutions are
marginal is, in a sense, to participate in the very normalization of
prisons that an abolitionist approach seeks to contest. Thus, the title
of this chapter is not “Women and the Prison System,” but rather “How
Gender Structures the Prison System.” Moreover, scholars and activists
who are involved in feminist projects should not consider the structure
of state punishment as marginal to their work. Forward-looking research
and organizing strategies should recognize that the deeply gendered
character of punishment both reflects and further entrenches the
gendered structure of the larger society.

Women prisoners have produced a small but impressive body of literature
that has illuminated significant aspects of the organization of
punishment that would have otherwise remained unacknowledged. Assata
Shakur’s memoirs,⁷³ for example, reveal the dangerous intersections of
racism, male domination, and state strategies of political repression.
In 1977 she was convicted on charges of murder and assault in connection
with a 1973 incident that left one New Jersey state trooper dead and
another wounded. She and her companion, Zayd Shakur, who was killed
during the shootout, were the targets of what we now name racial
profiling and were stopped by state troopers under the pretext of a
broken taillight. At the time Assata Shakur, known then as Joanne
Chesimard, was underground and had been anointed by the police and the
media as the “Soul of the Black Liberation
Army.” By her 1977 conviction, she either had been acquitted or had
charges dismissed in six other cases—upon the basis of which she had
been declared a fugitive in the first place. Her attorney, Lennox Hinds,
has pointed out that since it was proven that Assata Shakur did not
handle the gun with which the state troopers were shot, her mere
presence in the automobile, against the backdrop of the media
demonization to which she was subjected, constituted the basis of her
conviction. In the foreword to Shakur’s autobiography Hinds writes:

In the history of New Jersey, no woman pretrial detainee or prisoner has
ever been treated as she was, continuously confined in a men’s prison,
under twenty-four-hour surveillance of her most intimate functions,
without intellectual sustenance, adequate medical attention, and
exercise, and without the company of other women for all the years she
was in their custody.⁷⁴

There is no doubt that Assata Shakur’s status as a black political
prisoner accused of killing a state trooper caused her to be singled out
by the authorities for unusually cruel treatment. However, her own
account emphasizes the extent to which her individual experiences
reflected those of other imprisoned women, especially black and Puerto
Rican women. Her description of the strip search, which focuses on the
internal examination of body cavities, is especially revealing:

Joan Bird and Afeni Shakur [members of the Black Panther Party] had told
me about it after they had been bailed out in the Panther 21 trial. When
they had told me, I was horrified.

“You mean they really put their hands inside you, to search you?” I had
asked.

“Uh-huh,” they answered. Every woman who has ever been on the rock, or
in the old house of detention, can tell you about it. The women call it
“getting the finger” or, more vulgarly, “getting finger-fucked.”

“What happens if you refuse?” I had asked Afeni.

“They lock you in the hole and they don’t let you out until you consent
to be searched internally.”

I thought about refusing, but I sure as hell didn’t want to be in the
hole. I had had enough of solitary. The “internal search” was as
humiliating and disgusting as it sounded. You sit on the edge of this
table and the nurse holds your legs open and sticks a finger in your
vagina and moves it around. She has a plastic glove on. Some of them try
to put one finger in your vagina and another one up your rectum at the
same time.⁷⁵

I have quoted this passage so extensively because it exposes an everyday
routine in women’s prisons that verges on sexual assault as much as it
is taken for granted. Having been imprisoned in the Women’s House of
Detention to which Joan Bird and Afeni Shakur refer, I can personally
affirm the veracity of their claims. Over thirty years after Bird and
Afeni Shakur were released and after I myself spent several months in
the Women’s House of Detention, this issue of the strip search is still
very much on the front burner of women’s prison activism. In 2001
Sisters Inside, an Australian support organization for women prisoners,
launched a national campaign against the strip search, the slogan of
which was “Stop State Sexual Assault.” Assata
Shakur’s autobiography provides an abundance of insights about the
gendering of state punishment and reveals the extent to which women’s
prisons have held on to oppressive patriarchal practices that are
considered obsolete in the “free world.” She spent six years in several
jails and prisons before escaping in 1979 and receiving political asylum
by the Republic of Cuba in 1984, where she lives today.

Elizabeth Gurley Flynn wrote an earlier account of life in a women’s
prison, _The Alderson Story: My Life as a Political Prisoner._⁷⁶ At the
height of the McCarthy era, Flynn, a labor activist and Communist
leader, was convicted under the Smith Act and served two years in
Alderson Federal Reformatory for Women from 1955 to 1957. Following the
dominant model for women’s prisons during that period, Alderson’s
regimes were based on the assumption that “criminal” women could be
rehabilitated by assimilating correct womanly behaviors—that is, by
becoming experts in domesticity—especially cooking, cleaning, and
sewing. Of course, training designed to produce better wives and mothers
among middle-class white women effectively produced skilled domestic
servants among black and poor women. Flynn’s book provides vivid
descriptions of these everyday regimes. Her autobiography is located in
a tradition of prison writing by political prisoners that also includes
women of this era. Contemporary writings by women political prisoners
today include poems and short stories by Ericka Huggins and Susan
Rosenberg, analyses of the prison industrial complex by Linda Evans, and
curricula for HIV/AIDS education in women’s prisons by Kathy Boudin and
the members of the Bedford Hills ACE collective.⁷⁷

Despite the availability of perceptive portrayals of life in women’s
prisons, it has been extremely difficult to persuade the public—and
even, on occasion, to persuade prison
activists who are primarily concerned with the plight of male
prisoners—of the centrality of gender to an understanding of state
punishment. Although men constitute the vast majority of prisoners in
the world, important aspects of the operation of state punishment are
missed if it is assumed that women are marginal and thus undeserving of
attention. The most frequent justification for the inattention to women
prisoners and to the particular issues surrounding women’s imprisonment
is the relatively small proportion of women among incarcerated
populations throughout the world. In most countries, the percentage of
women among prison populations hovers around five percent.⁷⁸ However,
the economic and political shifts of the 1980s—the globalization of
economic markets, the deindustrialization of the U.S. economy, the
dismantling of such social service programs as Aid to Families of
Dependent Children, and, of course, the prison construction
boom—produced a significant acceleration in the rate of women’s
imprisonment both inside and outside the United States. In fact, women
remain today the fastest-growing sector of the U.S. prison population.
This recent rise in the rate of women’s imprisonment points directly to
the economic context that produced the prison industrial complex and
that has had a devastating impact on men and women alike.

It is from this perspective of the contemporary expansion of prisons,
both in the United States and throughout the world, that we should
examine some of the historical and ideological aspects of state
punishment imposed on women. Since the end of the eighteenth century,
when, as we have seen, imprisonment began to emerge as the dominant form
of punishment, convicted women have been represented as essentially
different from their male counterparts. It is true that men who commit
the kinds of transgressions that are
regarded as punishable by the state are labeled as social deviants.
Nevertheless, masculine criminality has always been deemed more “normal”
than feminine criminality. There has always been a tendency to regard
those women who have been publicly punished by the state for their
misbehaviors as significantly more aberrant and far more threatening to
society than their numerous male counterparts.

In seeking to understand this gendered difference in the perception of
prisoners, it should be kept in mind that as the prison emerged and
evolved as the major form of public punishment, women continued to be
routinely subjected to forms of punishment that have not been
acknowledged as such. For example, women have been incarcerated in
psychiatric institutions in greater proportions than in prisons.⁷⁹
Studies indicating that women have been even more likely to end up in
mental facilities than men suggest that while jails and prisons have
been dominant institutions for the control of men, mental institutions
have served a similar purpose for women. That is, deviant men have been
constructed as criminal, while deviant women have been constructed as
insane. Regimes that reflect this assumption continue to inform the
women’s prison. Psychiatric drugs continue to be distributed far more
extensively to imprisoned women than to their male counterparts. A
Native American woman incarcerated in the Women’s Correctional Center in
Montana related her experience with psychotropic drugs to sociologist
Luana Ross:

Haldol is a drug they give people who can’t cope with lockup. It makes
you feel dead, paralyzed. And then I started getting side effects from
Haldol. I wanted to fight anybody, any of the officers. I was screaming
at them and telling them to get out of
my face, so the doctor said, “We can’t have that.” And, they put me on
Tranxene. I don’t take pills; I never had trouble sleeping until I got
here. Now I’m supposed to see [the counselor] again because of my
dreams. If you got a problem, they’re not going to take care of it.
They’re going to put you on drugs so they can control you.⁸⁰

Prior to the emergence of the penitentiary and thus of the notion of
punishment as “doing time,” the use of confinement to control beggars,
thieves, and the insane did not necessarily distinguish among these
categories of deviancy. At this phase in the history of punishment—prior
to the American and French Revolutions—the classification process
through which criminality is differentiated from poverty and mental
illness had not yet developed. As the discourse on criminality and the
corresponding institutions to control it distinguished the “criminal”
from the “insane,” the gendered distinction took hold and continued to
structure penal policies. Gendered as female, this category of insanity
was highly sexualized. When we consider the impact of class and race
here, we can say that for white and affluent women, this equalization
tends to serve as evidence for emotional and mental disorders, but for
black and poor women, it has pointed to criminality.

It should also be kept in mind that until the abolition of slavery, the
vast majority of black women were subject to regimes of punishment that
differed significantly from those experienced by white women. As slaves,
they were directly and often brutally disciplined for conduct considered
perfectly normal in a context of freedom. Slave punishment was visibly
gendered—special penalties, were, for example, reserved for pregnant
women unable to reach the quotas that
determined how long and how fast they should work. In the slave
narrative of Moses Grandy, an especially brutal form of whipping is
described in which the woman was required to lie on the ground with her
stomach positioned in a hole, whose purpose was to safeguard the fetus
(conceived as future slave labor). If we expand our definition of
punishment under slavery, we can say that the coerced sexual relations
between slave and master constituted a penalty exacted on women, if only
for the sole reason that they were slaves. In other words, the deviance
of the slave master was transferred to the slave woman, whom he
victimized. Likewise, sexual abuse by prison guards is translated into
hypersexuality of women prisoners. The notion that female “deviance”
always has a sexual dimension persists in the contemporary era, and this
intersection of criminality and sexuality continues to be racialized.
Thus, white women labeled as “criminals” are more closely associated
with blackness than their “normal” counterparts.

Prior to the emergence of the prison as the major form of public
punishment, it was taken for granted that violators of the law would be
subjected to corporal and frequently capital penalties. What is not
generally recognized is the connection between state-inflicted corporal
punishment and the physical assaults on women in domestic spaces. This
form of bodily discipline has continued to be routinely meted out to
women in the context of intimate relationships, but it is rarely
understood to be related to state punishment.

Quaker reformers in the United States—especially the Philadelphia
Society for Alleviating the Miseries of Public Prisons, founded in
1787—played a pivotal role in campaigns to substitute imprisonment for
corporal punishment. Following in the tradition established by Elizabeth
Fry in England, Quakers were also responsible for extended crusades
to institute separate prisons for women. Given the practice of
incarcerating criminalized women in men’s prisons, the demand for
separate women’s prisons was viewed as quite radical during this period.
Fry formulated principles governing prison reform for women in her 1827
work, _Observations in Visiting, Superintendence and Government of
Female Prisoners_, which were taken up in the United States by women
such as Josephine Shaw Lowell and Abby Hopper Gibbons. In the 1870s,
Lowell and Gibbons helped to lead the campaign in New York for separate
prisons for women.

Prevailing attitudes toward women convicts differed from those toward
men convicts, who were assumed to have forfeited rights and liberties
that women generally could not claim even in the “free world.” Although
some women were housed in penitentiaries, the institution itself was
gendered as male, for by and large no particular arrangements were made
to accommodate sentenced women.

The women who served in penal institutions between 1820 and 1870 were
not subject to the prison reform experienced by male inmates. Officials
employed isolation, silence, and hard labor to rehabilitate male
prisoners. The lack of accommodations for female inmates made isolation
and silence impossible for them and productive labor was not considered
an important part of their routine. The neglect of female prisoners,
however, was rarely benevolent. Rather, a pattern of overcrowding, harsh
treatment, and sexual abuse recurred throughout prison histories.⁸¹

Male punishment was linked ideologically to penitence and reform. The
very forfeiture of rights and liberties implied
that with self-reflection, religious study, and work, male convicts
could achieve redemption and could recover these rights and liberties.
However, since women were not acknowledged as securely in possession of
these rights, they were not eligible to participate in this process of
redemption.

According to dominant views, women convicts were irrevocably fallen
women, with no possibility of salvation. If male criminals were
considered to be public individuals who had simply violated the social
contract, female criminals were seen as having transgressed fundamental
moral principles of womanhood. The reformers, who, following Elizabeth
Fry, argued that women were capable of redemption, did not really
contest these ideological assumptions about women’s place. In other
words, they did not question the very notion of “fallen women.” Rather,
they simply opposed the idea that “fallen women” could not be saved.
They could be saved, the reformers contended, and toward that end they
advocated separate penal facilities and a specifically female approach
to punishment. Their approach called for architectural models that
replaced cells with cottages and “rooms” in a way that was supposed to
infuse domesticity into prison life. This model facilitated a regime
devised to reintegrate criminalized women into the domestic life of wife
and mother. They did not, however, acknowledge the class and race
underpinnings of this regime. Training that was, on the surface,
designed to produce good wives and mothers in effect steered poor women
(and especially black women) into “free world” jobs in domestic service.
Instead of stay-at-home skilled wives and mothers, many women prisoners,
upon release, would become maids, cooks, and washerwomen for more
affluent women. A female custodial staff, the reformers also argued,
would minimize the sexual temptations, which they believed were often at
the root of female criminality.

When the reform movement calling for separate prisons for women emerged
in England and the United States during the nineteenth century,
Elizabeth Fry, Josephine Shaw, and other advocates argued against the
established idea that criminal women were beyond the reach of moral
rehabilitation. Like male convicts, who presumably could be “corrected”
by rigorous prison regimes, female convicts, they suggested, could also
be molded into moral beings by differently gendered imprisonment
regimes. Architectural changes, domestic regimes, and an all-female
custodial staff were implemented in the reformatory program proposed by
reformers,⁸² and eventually women’s prisons became as strongly anchored
to the social landscape as men’s prisons, but even more invisible. Their
greater invisibility was as much a reflection of the way women’s
domestic duties under patriarchy were assumed to be normal, natural, and
consequently invisible as it was of the relatively small numbers of
women incarcerated in these new institutions.

Twenty-one years after the first English reformatory for women was
established in London in 1853, the first U.S. reformatory for women was
opened in Indiana. The aim was to

train the prisoners in the “important” female role of domesticity. Thus
an important role of the reform movement in women’s prisons was to
encourage and ingrain “appropriate” gender roles, such as vocational
training in cooking, sewing and cleaning. To accommodate these goals,
the reformatory cottages were usually designed with kitchens, living
rooms, and even some nurseries for prisoners with infants.⁸³

However, this feminized public punishment did not affect all women in
the same way. When black and Native American women were imprisoned in
reformatories, they often were segregated from white women. Moreover,
they tended to be disproportionately sentenced to men’s prisons. In the
southern states in the aftermath of the Civil War, black women endured
the cruelties of the convict lease system unmitigated by the
feminization of punishment; neither their sentences nor the labor they
were compelled to do were lessened by virtue of their gender. As the
U.S. prison system evolved during the twentieth century, feminized modes
of punishment—the cottage system, domestic training, and so on—were
designed ideologically to reform white women, relegating women of color
in large part to realms of public punishment that made no pretense of
offering them femininity.

Moreover, as Lucia Zedner has pointed out, sentencing practices for
women within the reformatory system often required women of all racial
backgrounds to do more time than men for similar offenses. “This
differential was justified on the basis that women were sent to
reformatories not to be punished in proportion to the seriousness of
their offense but to be reformed and retrained, a process that, it was
argued, required time.”⁸⁴ At the same time, Zedner points out, this
tendency to send women to prison for longer terms than men was
accelerated by the eugenics movement, “which sought to have ‘genetically
inferior’ women removed from social circulation for as many of their
child-bearing years as possible.ʺ⁸⁵

At the beginning of the twenty-first century, women’s prisons have begun
to look more like their male counterparts, particularly facilities
constructed in the contemporary era of the prison industrial complex. As
corporate involvement in punishment expands in ways that would have been
unimaginable just two decades ago, the prison’s presumed goal of
rehabilitation has been thoroughly displaced by incapacitation as the
major objective of imprisonment. As I have already pointed out, now that
the population of U.S. prisons and jails has surpassed two million
people, the rate of increase in the numbers of women prisoners has
exceeded that of men. As criminologist Elliot Currie has pointed out,

For most of the period after World War II, the female incarceration rate
hovered at around 8 per 100,000; it did not reach double digits until
1977. Today it is 51 per 100,000 . . . At the current rates of increase,
there will be more women in American prisons in the year 2010 than there
were inmates of both sexes in 1970. When we combine the effects of race
and gender, the nature of these shifts in the prison population is even
clearer. The prison incarceration rate for black women today exceeds
that for white _men_ as recently as 1980.⁸⁶

Luana Ross’s study of Native American women incarcerated in the Women’s
Correctional Center in Montana argues that “prisons, as employed by the
Euro-American system, operate to keep Native Americans in a colonial
situation.”⁸⁷ She points out that Native people are vastly
overrepresented in the country’s federal and state prisons. In Montana,
where she did her research, they constitute 6 percent of the general
population, but 17.3 percent of the imprisoned population. Native women
are even more disproportionately present in Montana’s prison system.
They constitute 25 percent of all women imprisoned by the state.⁸⁸

Thirty years ago, around the time of the Attica uprising and the murder
of George Jackson at San Quentin, radical
opposition to the prison system identified it as a principal site of
state violence and repression. In part as a reaction to the invisibility
of women prisoners in this movement and in part as a consequence of the
rising women’s liberation movement, specific campaigns developed in
defense of the rights of women prisoners. Many of these campaigns put
forth—and continue to advance—radical critiques of state repression and
violence. Within the correctional community, however, feminism has been
influenced largely by liberal constructions of gender equality.

In contrast to the nineteenth-century reform movement, which was
grounded in an ideology of gender difference, late-twentieth-century
“reforms” have relied on a “separate but equal” model. This “separate
but equal” approach often has been applied uncritically, ironically
resulting in demands for more repressive conditions in order to render
women’s facilities “equal” to men’s. A clear example of this can be
discovered in a memoir, _The Warden Wore Pink_, written by a former
warden of Huron Valley Women’s Prison in Michigan. During the 1980s, the
author, Tekla Miller, advocated a change in policies within the Michigan
correctional system that would result in women prisoners being treated
_the same_ as men prisoners. With no trace of irony, she characterizes
as “feminist” her own fight for “gender equality” between male and
female prisoners and for equality between male and female institutions
of incarceration. One of these campaigns focuses on the unequal
allocation of weapons, which she sought to remedy:

Arsenals in men’s prisons are large rooms with shelves of shotguns,
rifles, hand guns, ammunition, gas canisters, and riot equipment . . .
Huron Valley Women’s arsenal was a small, five feet by two feet
closet that held two rifles, eight shotguns, two bullhorns, five
handguns, four gas canisters, and twenty sets of restraints.⁸⁹

It does not occur to her that a more productive version of feminism
would also question the organization of state punishment for men as well
and, in my opinion, would seriously consider the proposition that the
institution as a whole—gendered as it is—calls for the kind of critique
that might lead us to consider its abolition.

Miller also describes the case of an attempted escape by a woman
prisoner. The prisoner climbed over the razor ribbon but was captured
after she jumped to the ground on the other side. This escape attempt
occasioned a debate about the disparate treatment of men and women
escapees. Miller’s position was that guards should be instructed to
shoot at women just as they were instructed to shoot at men. She argued
that parity for women and men prisoners should consist in their equal
right to be fired upon by guards. The outcome of the debate, Miller
observed, was that

escaping women prisoners in medium or higher [security] prisons are
treated the same way as men. A warning shot is fired. If the prisoner
fails to halt and is over the fence, an officer is allowed to shoot to
injure. If the officer’s life is in danger, the officer can shoot to
kill.⁹⁰

Paradoxically, demands for parity with men’s prisons, instead of
creating greater educational, vocational, and health opportunities for
women prisoners, often have led to more repressive conditions for women.
This is not only a consequence of deploying liberal—that is,
formalistic—
notions of equality, but of, more dangerous, allowing male prisons to
function as the punishment norm. Miller points out that she attempted to
prevent a female prisoner, whom she characterizes as a “murderer”
serving a long term, from participating in graduation ceremonies at the
University of Michigan because male murderers were not given such
privileges. (Of course, she does not indicate the nature of the woman’s
murder charges—whether, for instance, she was convicted of killing an
abusive partner, as is the case for a substantial number of women
convicted of murder.) Although Miller did not succeed in preventing the
inmate from participating in the commencement, in addition to her cap
and gown, the prisoner was made to wear leg chains and handcuffs during
the ceremony.⁹¹ This is indeed a bizarre example of feminist demands for
equality within the prison system.

A widely publicized example of the use of repressive paraphernalia
historically associated with the treatment of male prisoners to create
“equality” for female prisoners was the 1996 decision by Alabama’s
prison commissioner to establish women’s chain gangs. After Alabama
became the first state to reinstitute chain gangs in 1995, then State
Corrections Commissioner Ron Jones announced the following year that
women would be shackled while they cut grass, picked up trash, or worked
a vegetable garden at Julia Tutwiler State Prison for Women. This
attempt to institute chain gangs for women was in part a response to
lawsuits by male prisoners, who charged that male chain gains
discriminated against men by virtue of their gender.⁹² However,
immediately after Jones’s announcement, Governor Fob James, who
obviously was pressured to prevent Alabama from acquiring the dubious
distinction of being the only U.S. state to have equal- opportunity
chain gangs, fired him.

Shortly after Alabama’s embarrassing flirtation with the possibility of
chain gangs for women, Sheriff Joe Arpaio of Maricopo County,
Arizona—represented in the media as “the toughest sheriff in
America”—held a press conference to announce that because he was “an
equal opportunity incarcerator,” he was establishing the country’s first
female chain gang.⁹³ When the plan was implemented, newspapers
throughout the country carried a photograph of chained women cleaning
Phoenix’s streets. Even though this may have been a publicity stunt
designed to bolster the fame of Sheriff Arpaio, the fact that this
women’s chain gang emerged against the backdrop of a generalized
increase in the repression inflicted on women prisoners is certainly
cause for alarm. Women’s prisons throughout the country increasingly
include sections known as security housing units. The regimes of
solitary confinement and sensory deprivation in the security housing
unit (SHU) in these sections within women’s prisons are smaller versions
of the rapidly proliferating super-maximum security prisons. Since the
population of women in prison now consists of a majority of women of
color, the historical resonances of slavery, colonization, and genocide
should not be missed in these images of women in chains and shackles.

As the level of repression in women’s prisons increases, and,
paradoxically, as the influence of domestic prison regimes recedes,
sexual abuse—which, like domestic violence, is yet another dimension of
the privatized punishment of women—has become an institutionalized
component of punishment behind prison walls. Although guard-on-prisoner
sexual abuse is not sanctioned as such, the widespread leniency with
which offending officers are treated suggests that for women, prison is
a space in which the threat of sexualized violence that looms in the
larger society
is effectively sanctioned as a routine aspect of the landscape of
punishment behind prison walls.

According to a 1996 Human Rights Watch report on the sexual abuse of
women in U.S. prisons:

Our findings indicate that being a woman prisoner in U.S. state prisons
can be a terrifying experience. If you are sexually abused, you cannot
escape from your abuser. Grievance or investigatory procedures, where
they exist, are often ineffectual, and correctional employees continue
to engage in abuse because they believe they will rarely be held
accountable, administratively or criminally. Few people outside the
prison walls know what is going on or care if they do know. Fewer still
do anything to address the problem.⁹⁴

The following excerpt from the summary of this report, entitled _All Too
Familiar: Sexual Abuse of Women in U.S. State Prisons_, reveals the
extent to which women’s prison environments are violently sexualized,
thus recapitulating the familiar violence that characterizes many
women’s private lives:

We found that male correctional employees have vaginally, anally, and
orally raped female prisoners and sexually assaulted and abused them. We
found that in the course of committing such gross misconduct, male
officers have not only used actual or threatened physical force, but
have also used their near total authority to provide or deny goods and
privileges to female prisoners to compel them to have sex or, in other
cases, to reward them for having
done so. In other cases, male officers have violated their most basic
professional duty and engaged in sexual contact with female prisoners
absent the use of threat of force or any material exchange. In addition
to engaging in sexual relations with prisoners, male officers have used
mandatory pat-frisks or room searches to grope women’s breasts,
buttocks, and vaginal areas and to view them inappropriately while in a
state of undress in the housing or bathroom areas. Male correctional
officers and staff have also engaged in regular verbal degradation and
harassment of female prisoners, thus contributing to a custodial
environment in the state prisons for women that is often highly
sexualized and excessively hostile.⁹⁵

The violent sexualization of prison life within women’s institutions
raises a number of issues that may help us develop further our critique
of the prison system. Ideologies of sexuality—and particularly the
intersection of race and sexuality—have had a profound effect on the
representations of and treatment received by women of color both within
and outside prison. Of course, black and Latino men experience a
perilous continuity in the way they are treated in school, where they
are disciplined as potential criminals; in the streets, where they are
subjected to racial profiling by the police; and in prison, where they
are warehoused and deprived of virtually all of their rights. For women,
the continuity of treatment from the free world to the universe of the
prison is even more complicated, since they also confront forms of
violence in prison that they have confronted in their homes and intimate
relationships.

The criminalization of black and Latina women includes
persisting images of hypersexuality that serve to justify sexual
assaults against them both in and outside of prison. Such images were
vividly rendered in a _Nightline_ television series filmed in November
1999 on location at California’s Valley State Prison for Women. Many of
the women interviewed by Ted Koppel complained that they received
frequent and unnecessary pelvic examinations, including when they
visited the doctor with such routine illnesses as colds. In an attempt
to justify these examinations, the chief medical officer explained that
women prisoners had rare opportunities for “male contact,” and that they
therefore welcomed these superfluous gynecological exams. Although this
officer was eventually removed from his position as a result of these
comments, his reassignment did little to alter the pervasive
vulnerability of imprisoned women to sexual abuse.

Studies on female prisons throughout the world indicate that sexual
abuse is an abiding, though unacknowledged, form of punishment to which
women, who have the misfortune of being sent to prison, are subjected.
This is one aspect of life in prison that women can expect to encounter,
either directly or indirectly, regardless of the written policies that
govern the institution. In June 1998, Radhika Coomaraswamy, the United
Nations Special Rapporteur for Violence Against Women, visited federal
and state prisons as well as Immigration and Naturalization detention
facilities in New York, Connecticut, New Jersey, Minnesota, Georgia, and
California. She was refused permission to visit women’s prisons in
Michigan, where serious allegations of sexual abuse were pending. In the
aftermath of her visits, Coomaraswamy announced that “sexual misconduct
by prison staff is widespread in American women’s prisons.”⁹⁶

This clandestine institutionalization of sexual abuse violates
one of the guiding principles of the United Nations’ Standard Minimum
Rules for the Treatment of Prisoners, a UN instrument first adopted in
1955 and used as a guideline by many governments to achieve what is
known as “good prison practice.” However, the U.S. government has done
little to publicize these rules and it is probably the case that most
correctional personnel have never heard of these UN standards. According
to the Standard Minimum Rules,

Imprisonment and other measures which result in cutting off an offender
from the outside world are afflictive by the very fact of taking from
the person the right of self-determination by depriving him of his
liberty. Therefore the prison system shall not, except as incidental to
justifiable segregation or the maintenance of discipline, aggravate the
suffering inherent in such a situation.⁹⁷

Sexual abuse is surreptitiously incorporated into one of the most
habitual aspects of women’s imprisonment, the strip search. As activists
and prisoners themselves have pointed out, the state itself is directly
implicated in this routinization of sexual abuse, both in permitting
such conditions that render women vulnerable to explicit sexual coercion
carried out by guards and other prison staff and by incorporating into
routine policy such practices as the strip search and body cavity
search.

Australian lawyer/activist Amanda George has pointed out that

[t]he acknowledgement that sexual assault does occur in institutions for
people with intellectual disabilities, prisons, psychiatric hospitals,
youth
training centres and police stations, usually centres around the
criminal acts of rape and sexual assault by individuals employed in
those institutions. These offences, though they are rarely reported, are
clearly understood as being ”crimes” for which the individual and not
the state is responsible. At the same time as the state deplores
“unlawful” sexual assaults by its employees, it actually uses sexual
assault as a means of control.

In Victoria, prison and police officers are vested with the power and
responsibility to do acts which, if done outside of work hours, would be
crimes of sexual assault. If a person does not “consent” to being
stripped naked by these officers, force can lawfully be used to do it .
. . These legal strip searches are, in the author’s view, sexual
assaults within the definition of indecent assault in the _Crimes Act
1958 (Vic)_ as amended in section 39.⁹⁸

At a November 2001 conference on women in prison held by the
Brisbane-based organization Sisters Inside, Amanda George described an
action performed before a national gathering of correctional personnel
working in women’s prisons. Several women seized control of the stage
and, some playing guards, others playing the roles of prisoners,
dramatized a strip search. According to George, the gathering was so
repulsed by this enactment of a practice that occurs routinely in
women’s prisons everywhere that many of the participants felt compelled
to disassociate themselves from such practices, insisting that this was
not what they did. Some of the guards, George said, simply cried upon
watching representations of their own actions outside the prison
context. What they must have realized is that “without the
uniform, without the power of the state, [the strip search] would be
sexual assault.”⁹⁹

But why is an understanding of the pervasiveness of sexual abuse in
women’s prisons an important element of a radical analysis of the prison
system, and especially of those forward-looking analyses that lead us in
the direction of abolition? Because the call to abolish the prison as
the dominant form of punishment cannot ignore the extent to which the
institution of the prison has stockpiled ideas and practices that are
hopefully approaching obsolescence in the larger society, but that
retain all their ghastly vitality behind prison walls. The destructive
combination of racism and misogyny, however much it has been challenged
by social movements, scholarship, and art over the last three decades,
retains all its awful consequences within women’s prisons. The
relatively uncontested presence of sexual abuse in women’s prisons is
one of many such examples. The increasing evidence of a U.S. prison
industrial complex with global resonances leads us to think about the
extent to which the many corporations that have acquired an investment
in the expansion of the prison system are, like the state, directly
implicated in an institution that perpetuates violence against women.

5

THE PRISON INDUSTRIAL COMPLEX

“For private business prison labor is like a pot of gold. No strikes. No
union organizing. No health benefits, unemployment insurance, or
workers’ compensation to pay. No language barriers, as in foreign
countries. New leviathan prisons are being built on thousands of eerie
acres of factories inside the walls. Prisoners do data entry for
Chevron, make telephone reservations for TWA, raise hogs, shovel manure,
and make circuit boards, limousines, waterbeds, and lingerie for
Victoria’s Secret, all at a fraction of the cost of ‘free labor.’”

—Linda Evans and Eve Goldberg¹⁰⁰

 

The exploitation of prison labor by private corporations is one aspect
among an array of relationships linking corporations, government,
correctional communities, and media. These relationships constitute what
we now call a prison industrial complex. The term “prison industrial
complex” was introduced by activists and scholars to contest prevailing
beliefs that increased levels of crime were the root cause of mounting
prison populations. Instead, they argued, prison construction and the
attendant drive to fill these new structures with human bodies have been
driven by ideologies of racism and the pursuit of profit. Social
historian Mike Davis first used the term in relation to California’s
penal system, which, he observed, already had begun in the 1990s to
rival
agribusiness and land development as a major economic and political
force.¹⁰¹

To understand the social meaning of the prison today within the context
of a developing prison industrial complex means that punishment has to
be conceptually severed from its seemingly indissoluble link with crime.
How often do we encounter the phrase “crime and punishment”? To what
extent has the perpetual repetition of the phrase “crime and punishment”
in literature, as titles of television shows, both fictional and
documentary, and in everyday conversation made it extremely difficult to
think about punishment beyond this connection? How have these portrayals
located the prison in a causal relation to crime as a natural,
necessary, and permanent effect, thus inhibiting serious debates about
the viability of the prison today?

The notion of a prison industrial complex insists on understandings of
the punishment process that take into account economic and political
structures and ideologies, rather than focusing myopically on individual
criminal conduct and efforts to “curb crime.” The fact, for example,
that many corporations with global markets now rely on prisons as an
important source of profit helps us to understand the rapidity with
which prisons began to proliferate precisely at a time when official
studies indicated that the crime rate was falling. The notion of a
prison industrial complex also insists that the racialization of prison
populations—and this is not only true of the United States, but of
Europe, South America, and Australia as well—is not an incidental
feature. Thus, critiques of the prison industrial complex undertaken by
abolitionist activists and scholars are very much linked to critiques of
the global persistence of racism. Antiracist and other social justice
movements are incomplete with attention to the politics of imprisonment.
At the 2001
United Nations World Conference Against Racism held in Durban, South
Africa, a few individuals active in abolitionist campaigns in various
countries attempted to bring this connection to the attention of the
international community. They pointed out that the expanding system of
prisons throughout the world both relies on and further promotes
structures of racism even though its proponents may adamantly maintain
that it is race-neutral.

Some critics of the prison system have employed the term “correctional
industrial complex” and others “penal industrial complex.” These and the
term I have chosen to underscore, “prison industrial complex,” all
clearly resonate with the historical concept of a “military industrial
complex,” whose usage dates back to the presidency of Dwight Eisenhower.
It may seem ironic that a Republican president was the first to
underscore a growing and dangerous alliance between the military and
corporate worlds, but it clearly seemed right to antiwar activists and
scholars during the era of the Vietnam War. Today, some activists
mistakenly argue that the prison industrial complex is moving into the
space vacated by the military industrial complex. However, the so-called
War on Terrorism initiated by the Bush administration in the aftermath
of the 2002 attacks on the World Trade Center has made it very clear
that the links between the military, corporations, and government are
growing stronger, not weaker.

A more cogent way to define the relationship between the military
industrial complex and the prison industrial complex would be to call it
symbiotic. These two complexes mutually support and promote each other
and, in fact, often share technologies. During the early nineties, when
defense production was temporarily on the decline, this connection
between the military industry and the criminal justice
/punishment industry was acknowledged in a 1994 _Wall Street Journal_
article entitled “Making Crime Pay: The Cold War of the ’90s”:

Parts of the defense establishment are cashing in, too, sensing a
logical new line of business to help them offset military cutbacks.
Westinghouse Electric Corp., Minnesota Mining and Manufacturing Co, GDE
Systems (a division of the old General Dynamics) and Alliant Techsystems
Inc., for instance, are pushing crime fighting equipment and have
created special divisions to retool their defense technology for
America’s streets.¹⁰²

The article describes a conference sponsored by the National Institute
of Justice, the research arm of the Justice Department, entitled “Law
Enforcement Technology in the 21st Century.” The secretary of defense
was a major presenter at this conference, which explored topics such as,
“The role of the defense industry, particularly for dual use and
conversion.”

Hot topics: defense-industry technology that could lower the level of
violence involved in crime fighting. Sandia National Laboratories, for
instance, is experimenting with a dense foam that can be sprayed at
suspects, temporarily blinding and deafening them under breathable
bubbles. Stinger Corporation is working on “smart guns,” which will fire
only for the owner, and retractable spiked barrier strips to unfurl in
front of fleeing vehicles. Westinghouse is promoting the “smart car,” in
which minicomputers could be linked up with big
mainframes at the police department, allowing for speedy booking of
prisoners, as well as quick exchanges of information...¹⁰³

But an analysis of the relationship between the military and prison
industrial complex is not only concerned with the transference of
technologies from the military to the law enforcement industry. What may
be even more important to our discussion is the extent to which both
share important structural features. Both systems generate huge profits
from processes of social destruction. Precisely that which is
advantageous to those corporations, elected officials, and government
agents who have obvious stakes in the expansion of these systems begets
grief and devastation for poor and racially dominated communities in the
United States and throughout the world. The transformation of imprisoned
bodies—and they are in their majority bodies of color—into sources of
profit who consume and also often produce all kinds of commodities,
devours public funds, which might otherwise be available for social
programs such as education, housing, childcare, recreation, and drug
programs.

Punishment no longer constitutes a marginal area of the larger economy.
Corporations producing all kinds of goods—from buildings to electronic
devices and hygiene products—and providing all kinds of services—from
meals to therapy and healthcare—are now directly involved in the
punishment business. That is to say, companies that one would assume are
far removed from the work of state punishment have developed major
stakes in the perpetuation of a prison system whose historical
obsolescence is therefore that much more difficult to recognize. It was
during the decade of the 1980s that corporate ties to the punishment
system became
more extensive and entrenched than ever before. But throughout the
history of the U.S. prison system, prisoners have always constituted a
potential source of profit. For example, they have served as valuable
subjects in medical research, thus positioning the prison as a major
link between universities and corporations.

During the post-World War II period, for example, medical
experimentation on captive populations helped to hasten the development
of the pharmaceutical industry. According to Allen Hornblum,

[T]he number of American medical research programs that relied on
prisoners as subjects rapidly expanded as zealous doctors and
researchers, grant-making universities, and a burgeoning pharmaceutical
industry raced for greater market share. Society’s marginal people were,
as they had always been, the grist for the medical-pharmaceutical mill,
and prison inmates in particular would become the raw materials for
postwar profit-making and academic advancement.¹⁰⁴

Hornblum’s book, _Acres of Skin: Human Experiments at Holmesburg
Prison_, highlights the career of research dermatologist Albert Kligman,
who was a professor at the University of Pennsylvania. Kligman, the
“Father of RetinA,” ¹⁰⁵ conducted hundreds of experiments on the men
housed in Holmesburg Prison and, in the process, trained many
researchers to use what were later recognized as unethical research
methods.

When Dr. Kligman entered the aging prison he was awed by the potential
it held for his research. In
1966, he recalled in a newspaper interview: “All I saw before me were
acres of skin. It was like a farmer seeing a fertile field for the first
time.” The hundreds of inmates walking aimlessly before him represented
a unique opportunity for unlimited and undisturbed medical research. He
described it in this interview as “an anthropoid colony, mainly healthy”
under perfect control conditions.¹⁰⁶

By the time the experimentation program was shut down in 1974 and new
federal regulations prohibited the use of prisoners as subjects for
academic and corporate research, numerous cosmetics and skin creams had
already been tested. Some of them had caused great harm to these
subjects and could not be marketed in their original form. Johnson and
Johnson, Ortho Pharmaceutical, and Dow Chemical are only a few of the
corporations that reaped great material benefits from these experiments.

The potential impact of corporate involvement in punishment could have
been glimpsed in the Kligman experiments at Holmesburg Prison as early
as the 1950s and 1960s. However, it was not until the 1980s and the
increasing globalization of capitalism that the massive surge of capital
into the punishment economy began. The deindustrialization processes
that resulted in plant shutdowns throughout the country created a huge
pool of vulnerable human beings, a pool of people for whom no further
jobs were available. This also brought more people into contact with
social services, such as AFDC (Aid to Families with Dependent Children)
and other welfare agencies. It is not accidental that “welfare, as we
have known it”—to use former President Clinton’s words—came under severe
attack and was eventually disestablished. This was known as “welfare
reform.” At the same
time, we experienced the privatization and corporatization of services
that were previously run by government. The most obvious example of this
privatization process was the transformation of government-run hospitals
and health services into a gigantic complex of what are euphemistically
called health maintenance organizations. In this sense we might also
speak of a “medical industrial complex.ʺ¹⁰⁷ In fact, there is a
connection between one of the first private hospital companies, Hospital
Corporation of America—known today as HCA—and Corrections Corporation of
America (CCA). Board members of HCA, which today has two hundred
hospitals and seventy outpatient surgery centers in twenty-four states,
England, and Switzerland helped to start Correctional Corporations of
America in 1983.

In the context of an economy that was driven by an unprecedented pursuit
of profit, no matter what the human cost, and the concomitant
dismantling of the welfare state, poor people’s abilities to survive
became increasingly constrained by the looming presence of the prison.
The massive prison-building project that began in the 1980s created the
means of concentrating and managing what the capitalist system had
implicitly declared to be a human surplus. In the meantime, elected
officials and the dominant media justified the new draconian sentencing
practices, sending more and more people to prison in the frenzied drive
to build more and more prisons by arguing that this was the only way to
make our communities safe from murderers, rapists, and robbers.

The media, especially television . . . have a vested interest in
perpetuating the notion that crime is out of control. With new
competition from cable networks and 24-hour news channels, TV news and
programs about crime . . . have proliferated madly.
According to the Center for Media and Public Affairs, crime coverage was
the number-one topic on the nightly news over the past decade. From 1990
to 1998, homicide rates dropped by half nationwide, but homicide stories
on the three major networks rose almost fourfold.¹⁰⁸

During the same period when crime rates were declining, prison
populations soared. According to a recent report by the U.S. Department
of Justice, at the end of the year 2001, there were 2,100,146 people
incarcerated in the United States.¹⁰⁹ The terms and numbers as they
appear in this government report require some preliminary discussion. I
hesitate to make unmediated use of such statistical evidence because it
can discourage the very critical thinking that ought to be elicited by
an understanding of the prison industrial complex. It is precisely the
abstraction of numbers that plays such a central role in criminalizing
those who experience the misfortune of imprisonment. There are many
different kinds of men and women in the prisons, jails, and INS and
military detention centers, whose lives are erased by the Bureau of
Justice Statistics figures. The numbers recognize no distinction between
the woman who is imprisoned on drug conspiracy and the man who is in
prison for killing his wife, a man who might actually end up spending
less time behind bars than the woman.

With this observation in mind, the statistical breakdown is as follows:
There were 1,324,465 people in “federal and state prisons,” 15,852 in
“territorial prisons,” 631,240 in “local jails,” 8,761 in “Immigration
and Naturalization Service detention facilities,” 2,436 in “military
facilities,” 1,912 in “jails in Indian country,” and 108,965 in
“juvenile facilities.” In the ten years between 1990 and 2000, 351 new
places of
confinement were opened by states and more than 528,000 beds were added,
amounting to 1,320 state facilities, representing an eighty-one percent
increase. Moreover, there are currently 84 federal facilities and 264
private facilities.¹¹⁰

The government reports, from which these figures are taken, emphasize
the extent to which incarceration rates are slowing down. The Bureau of
Justice Statistics report entitled “Prisoners in 2001” introduces the
study by indicating that “the Nation’s prison population grew 1.1%,
which was less than the average annual growth of 3.8% since yearend
1995. During 2001 the prison population rose at the lowest rate since
1972 and had the smallest absolute increase since 1979.”¹¹¹ However
small the increase, these numbers themselves would defy the imagination
were they not so neatly classified and rationally organized. To place
these figures in historical perspective, try to imagine how people in
the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries—and indeed for most of the
twentieth century—who welcomed the new, and then quite extraordinary,
system of punishment called the prison might have responded had they
known that such a colossal number of lives would be eventually claimed
permanently by this institution. I have already shared my own memories
of a time three decades ago when the prison population was comprised of
a tenth of the present numbers.

The prison industrial complex is fueled by privatization patterns that,
it will be recalled, have also drastically transformed health care,
education, and other areas of our lives. Moreover, the prison
privatization trends—both the increasing presence of corporations in the
prison economy and the establishment of private prisons—are reminiscent
of the historical efforts to create a profitable punishment industry
based on the new supply of “free” black male laborers in the
aftermath of the Civil War. Steven Donziger, drawing from the work of
Norwegian criminologist Nils Christie, argues:

[C]ompanies that service the criminal justice system need sufficient
quantities of raw materials to guarantee long-term growth . . . In the
criminal justice field, _the raw material is prisoners_, and industry
will do what is necessary to guarantee a steady supply. For the supply
of prisoners to grow, criminal justice policies must ensure a sufficient
number of incarcerated Americans regardless of whether crime is rising
or the incarceration is necessary.¹¹²

In the post-Civil War era, emancipated black men and women comprised an
enormous reservoir of labor at a time when planters—and
industrialists—could no longer rely on slavery, as they had done in the
past. This labor became increasingly available for use by private agents
precisely through the convict lease system, discussed earlier, and
related systems such as debt peonage. Recall that in the aftermath of
slavery, the penal population drastically shifted, so that in the South
it rapidly became disproportionately black. This transition set the
historical stage for the easy acceptance of disproportionately black
prison populations today. According to 2002 Bureau of Justice
Statistics, African-Americans as a whole now represent the majority of
county, state, and federal prisoners, with a total of 803,400 black
inmates—118, 600 more than the total number of white inmates. If we
include Latinos, we must add another 283,000 bodies of color.¹¹³

As the rate of increase in the incarceration of black prisoners
continues to rise, the racial composition of the incarcerated population
is approaching the proportion of black
prisoners to white during the era of the southern convict lease and
county chain gang systems. Whether this human raw material is used for
purposes of labor or for the consumption of commodities provided by a
rising number of corporations directly implicated in the prison
industrial complex, it is clear that black bodies are considered
dispensable within the “free world” but as a major source of profit in
the prison world.

The privatization characteristic of convict leasing has its contemporary
parallels, as companies such as CCA and Wackenhut literally run prisons
for profit. At the beginning of the twenty-first century, the numerous
private prison companies operating in the United States own and operate
facilities that hold 91,828 federal and state prisoners.¹¹⁴ Texas and
Oklahoma can claim the largest number of people in private prisons. But
New Mexico imprisons forty-four percent of its prison population in
private facilities, and states such as Montana, Alaska, and Wyoming
turned over more than twenty-five percent of their prison population to
private companies.¹¹⁵ In arrangements reminiscent of the convict lease
system, federal, state, and county governments pay private companies a
fee for each inmate, which means that private companies have a stake in
retaining prisoners as long as possible, and in keeping their facilities
filled.

In the state of Texas, there are thirty-four government-owned, privately
run jails in which approximately 5,500 out-of-state prisoners are
incarcerated. These facilities generate about eighty million dollars
annually for Texas.¹¹⁶ One dramatic example involves Capital Corrections
Resources, Inc., which operates the Brazoria Detention Center, a
government-owned facility located forty miles outside of Houston, Texas.
Brazoria came to public attention in August 1997 when a videotape
broadcast on national television showed prisoners
there being bitten by police dogs and viciously kicked in the groin and
stepped on by guards. The inmates, forced to crawl on the floor, also
were being shocked with stun guns, while guards—who referred to one
black prisoner as “boy”—shouted, “Crawl faster!ʺ¹¹⁷ In the aftermath of
the release of this tape, the state of Missouri withdrew the 415
prisoners it housed in the Brazoria Detention Center. Although few
references were made in the accompanying news reports to the
indisputably racialized character of the guards’ outrageous behavior, in
the section of the Brazoria videotape that was shown on national
television, black male prisoners were seen to be the primary targets of
the guards’ attacks.

The thirty-two-minute Brazoria tape, represented by the jail authorities
as a training tape—allegedly showing corrections officers “what _not_ to
do”—was made in September 1996, after a guard allegedly smelled
marijuana in the jail. Important evidence of the abuse that takes place
behind the walls and gates of private prisons, it came to light in
connection with a law-suit filed by one of the prisoners who was bitten
by a dog; he was suing Brazoria County for a hundred thousand dollars in
damage. The Brazoria jailors’ actions—which, according to prisoners
there, were far worse than depicted on the tape—are indicative not only
of the ways in which many prisoners throughout the country are treated,
but of generalized attitudes toward people locked up in jails and
prisons.

According to an Associated Press news story, the Missouri inmates, once
they had been transferred back to their home state from Brazoria, told
the _Kansas City Star_:

[G]uards at the Brazoria County Detention Center used cattle prods and
other forms of intimidation to win respect and force prisoners to say,
“I love Texas.” “What you saw on tape wasn’t a fraction of
what happened that day,” said inmate Louis Watkins, referring to the
videotaped cellblock raid of September 18, 1996. “I’ve never seen
anything like that in the movies.”¹¹⁸

In 2000 there were twenty-six for-profit prison corporations in the
United States that operated approximately 150 facilities in twenty-eight
states.¹¹⁹ The largest of these companies, CCA and Wackenhut, control
76.4 percent of the private prison market globally. CCA is headquartered
in Nashville, Tennessee, and until 2001, its largest shareholder was the
multinational headquartered in Paris, Sodexho Alliance, which, through
its U.S. subsidiary, Sodexho Marriott, provides catering services at
nine hundred U.S. colleges and universities. The Prison Moratorium
Project, an organization promoting youth activism, led a protest
campaign against Sodexho Marriott on campuses throughout the country.
Among the campuses that dropped Sodexho were SUNY Albany, Goucher
College, and James Madison University. Students had staged sit-ins and
organized rallies on more than fifty campuses before Sodexho divested
its holdings in CCA in fall 2001.¹²⁰

Though private prisons represent a fairly small proportion of prisons in
the United States, the privatization model is quickly becoming the
primary mode of organizing punishment in many other countries.¹²¹ These
companies have tried to take advantage of the expanding population of
women prisoners, both in the United States and globally. In 1996, the
first private women’s prison was established by CCA in Melbourne,
Australia. The government of Victoria “adopted the U.S. model of
privatization in which financing, design, construction, and ownership of
the prison are awarded to one contractor and the government pays them
back for
construction over twenty years. This means that it is virtually
impossible to remove the contractor because that contractor owns the
prison.ʺ¹²²

As a direct consequence of the campaign organized by prison activist
groups in Melbourne, Victoria withdrew the contract from CCA in 2001.
However, a significant portion of Australia’s prison system remains
privatized. In the fall of 2002, the government of Queensland renewed
Wackenhut’s contract to run a 710-bed prison in Brisbane. The value of
the five-year contract is $66.5 million. In addition to the facility in
Brisbane, Wackenhut manages eleven other prisons in Australia and New
Zealand and furnishes health care services in eleven public prisons in
the state of Victoria.¹²³ In the press release announcing this contract
renewal, Wackenhut describes its global business activities as follows:

WCC, a world leader in the privatized corrections industry, has
contracts/awards to manage 60 correctional /detention facilities in
North America, Europe, Australia, South Africa and New Zealand with a
total of approximately 43,000 beds. WCC also provides prisoner
transportation services, electronic monitoring for home detainees,
correctional health care and mental health services. WCC offers
government agencies a turnkey approach to the development of new
correctional and mental health institutions that includes design,
construction, financing, and operations.¹²⁴

But to understand the reach of the prison industrial complex, it is not
enough to evoke the looming power of the private prison business. By
definition, those companies court the state within and outside the
United States for the purpose
of obtaining prison contracts, bringing punishment and profit together
in a menacing embrace. Still, this is only the most visible dimension of
the prison industrial complex, and it should not lead us to ignore the
more comprehensive corporatization that is a feature of contemporary
punishment. As compared to earlier historical eras, the prison economy
is no longer a small, identifiable, and containable set of markets. Many
corporations, whose names are highly recognizable by “free world”
consumers, have discovered new possibilities for expansion by selling
their products to correctional facilities.

In the 1990s, the variety of corporations making money from prisons is
truly dizzying, ranging from Dial Soap to Famous Amos cookies, from AT&T
to health-care providers . . . In 1995 Dial Soap sold $100,000 worth of
its product to the New York City jail system alone . . . When VitaPro
Foods of Montreal, Canada, contracted to supply inmates in the state of
Texas with its soy-based meat substitute, the contract was worth $34
million a year.¹²⁵

Among the many businesses that advertise in the yellow pages on the
corrections.com Web site are Archer Daniel Midlands, Nestle Food
Service, Ace Hardware, Polaroid, Hewlett-Packard, RJ Reynolds, and the
communications companies Sprint, AT&T, Verizon, and Ameritech. One
conclusion to be drawn here is that even if private prison companies
were prohibited—an unlikely prospect, indeed—the prison industrial
complex and its many strategies for profit would remain relatively
intact. Private prisons are direct sources of profit for the companies
that run them, but public prisons have become so thoroughly saturated
with the
profit-producing products and services of private corporations that the
distinction is not as meaningful as one might suspect. Campaigns against
privatization that represent public prisons as an adequate alternative
to private prisons can be misleading. It is true that a major reason for
the profitability of private prisons consists in the nonunion labor they
employ, and this important distinction should be highlighted.
Nevertheless, public prisons are now equally tied to the corporate
economy and constitute an ever-growing source of capitalist profit.

Extensive corporate investment in prisons has significantly raised the
stakes for antiprison work. It means that serious antiprison activists
must be willing to look much further in their analyses and organizing
strategies than the actual institution of the prison. Prison reform
rhetoric, which has always undergirded dominant critiques of the prison
system, will not work in this new situation. If reform approaches have
tended to bolster the permanence of the prison in the past, they
certainly will not suffice to challenge the economic and political
relationships that sustain the prison today. This means that in the era
of the prison industrial complex, activists must pose hard questions
about the relationship between global capitalism and the spread of
U.S.-style prisons throughout the world.

The global prison economy is indisputably dominated by the United
States. This economy not only consists of the products, services, and
ideas that are directly marketed to other governments, but it also
exercises an enormous influence over the development of the style of
state punishment throughout the world. One dramatic example can be seen
in the opposition to Turkey’s attempts to transform its prisons. In
October 2000, prisoners in Turkey, many of whom are associated with left
political movements, began a “death
fast” as a way of dramatizing their opposition to the Turkish
government’s decision to introduce “F-Type,” or U.S.-style, prisons.
Compared to the traditional dormitory-style facilities, these new
prisons consist of one- to three-person cells, which are opposed by the
prisoners because of the regimes of isolation they facilitate and
because mistreatment and torture are far more likely in isolation. In
December 2000, thirty prisoners were killed in clashes with security
forces in twenty prisons.¹²⁶ As of September 2002, more than fifty
prisoners have died of hunger, including two women, Gulnihal Yilmaz and
Birsen Hosver, who were among the most recent prisoners to succumb to
the death fast.

“F-Type” prisons in Turkey were inspired by the recent emergence of the
super-maximum security—or supermax—prison in the United States, which
presumes to control otherwise unmanageable prisoners by holding them in
permanent solitary confinement and by subjecting them to varying degrees
of sensory deprivation. In its _2002 World Report_, Human Rights Watch
paid particular attention to the concerns raised by

the spread of ultra-modern “super-maximum” security prisons. Originally
prevalent in the United States . . . the supermax model was increasingly
followed in other countries. Prisoners confined in such facilities spent
an average of twenty-three hours a day in their cells, enduring extreme
social isolation, enforced idleness, and extraordinarily limited
recreational and educational opportunities. While prison authorities
defended the use of super-maximum security facilities by asserting that
they held only the most dangerous, disruptive, or escape-prone inmates,
few safeguards existed to prevent
other prisoners from being arbitrarily or discriminatorily transferred
to such facilities. In Australia, the inspector of custodial services
found that some prisoners were being held indefinitely in special high
security units without knowing why or when their isolation would end.¹²⁷

Among the many countries that have recently constructed super-maximum
security prisons is South Africa. Construction was completed on the
supermax prison in Kokstad, KwaZulu-Natal in August 2000, but it was not
officially opened until May 2002. Ironically, the reason given for the
delay was the competition for water between the prison and a new
low-cost housing development.¹²⁸ I am highlighting South Africa’s
embrace of the supermax because of the apparent ease with which this
most repressive version of the U.S. prison has established itself in a
country that has just recently initiated the project of building a
democratic, non-racist, and nonsexist society. South Africa was the
first country in the world to create constitutional assurances for gay
rights, and it immediately abolished the death penalty after the
dismantling of apartheid. Nevertheless, following the example of the
United States, the South African prison system is expanding and becoming
more oppressive. The U.S. private prison company Wackenhut has secured
several contracts with the South African government and by constructing
private prisons further legitimizes the trend toward privatization
(which affects the availability of basic services from utilities to
education) in the economy as a whole.

South Africa’s participation in the prison industrial complex
constitutes a major impediment to the creation of a democratic society.
In the United States, we have already felt the insidious and socially
damaging effects of prison
expansion. The dominant social expectation is that young black, Latino,
Native American, and Southeast Asian men—and increasingly women as
well—will move naturally from the free world into prison, where, it is
assumed, they belong. Despite the important gains of antiracist social
movements over the last half century, racism hides from view within
institutional structures, and its most reliable refuge is the prison
system.

The racist arrests of vast numbers of immigrants from Middle Eastern
countries in the aftermath of the attacks on September 11, 2001, and the
subsequent withholding of information about the names of numbers of
people held in INS detention centers, some of which are owned and
operated by private corporations, do not augur a democratic future. The
uncontested detention of increasing numbers of undocumented immigrants
from the global South has been aided considerably by the structures and
ideologies associated with the prison industrial complex. We can hardly
move in the direction of justice and equality in the twenty-first
century if we are unwilling to recognize the enormous role played by
this system in extending the power of racism and xenophobia.

Radical opposition to the global prison industrial complex sees the
antiprison movement as a vital means of expanding the terrain on which
the quest for democracy will unfold. This movement is thus antiracist,
anticapitalist, antisexist, and antihomophobic. It calls for the
abolition of the prison as the dominant mode of punishment but at the
same time recognizes the need for genuine solidarity with the millions
of men, women, and children who are behind bars. A major challenge of
this movement is to do the work that will create more humane, habitable
environments for people in prison without bolstering the permanence of
the prison system. How, then, do we accomplish this balancing
act of passionately attending to the needs of prisoners—calling for less
violent conditions, an end to state sexual assault, improved physical
and mental health care, greater access to drug programs, better
educational work opportunities, unionization of prison labor, more
connections with families and communities, shorter or alternative
sentencing—and at the same time call for alternatives to sentencing
altogether, no more prison construction, and abolitionist strategies
that question the place of the prison in our future?

6

ABOLITIONIST ALTERNATIVES

“Forget about reform; it’s time to talk about abolishing jails and
prisons in American society . . . Still—abolition? Where do you put the
prisoners? The ‘criminals’? What’s the alternative? First, having no
alternative at all would create less crime than the present criminal
training centers do. Second, the only full alternative is building the
kind of society that does not need prisons: A decent redistribution of
power and income so as to put out the hidden fire of burning envy that
now flames up in crimes of property—both burglary by the poor and
embezzlement by the affluent. And a decent sense of community that can
support, reintegrate and truly rehabilitate those who suddenly become
filled with fury or despair, and that can face them not as
objects—‘criminals’—but as people who have committed illegal acts, as
have almost all of us.”

—Arthur Waskow, Institute for Policy Studies¹²⁹

 

If jails and prisons are to be abolished, then what will replace them?
This is the puzzling question that often interrupts further
consideration of the prospects for abolition. Why should it be so
difficult to imagine alternatives to our current system of
incarceration? There are a number of reasons why we tend to balk at the
idea that it may be possible to eventually create an entirely
different—and perhaps more egalitarian—system of justice. First of all,
we think of the
current system, with its exaggerated dependence on imprisonment, as an
unconditional standard and thus have great difficulty envisioning any
other way of dealing with the more than two million people who are
currently being held in the country’s jails, prisons, youth facilities,
and immigration detention centers. Ironically, even the anti-death
penalty campaign tends to rely on the assumption that life imprisonment
is the most rational alternative to capital punishment. As important as
it may be to abolish the death penalty, we should be conscious of the
way the contemporary campaign against capital punishment has a
propensity to recapitulate the very historical patterns that led to the
emergence of the prison as the dominant form of punishment. The death
penalty has coexisted with the prison, though imprisonment was supposed
to serve as an alternative to corporal and capital punishment. This is a
major dichotomy. A critical engagement with this dichotomy would involve
taking seriously the possibility of linking the goal of death penalty
abolitionism with strategies for prison abolition.

It is true that if we focus myopically on the existing system—and
perhaps this is the problem that leads to the assumption that
imprisonment is the only alternative to death—it is very hard to imagine
a structurally similar system capable of handling such a vast population
of lawbreakers. If, however, we shift our attention from the prison,
perceived as an isolated institution, to the set of relationships that
comprise the prison industrial complex, it may be easier to think about
alternatives. In other words, a more complicated framework may yield
more options than if we simply attempt to discover a single substitute
for the prison system. The first step, then, would be to let go of the
desire to discover one single alternative system of punishment that
would occupy the same footprint as the prison system.

Since the 1980s, the prison system has become increasingly ensconced in
the economic, political and ideological life of the United States and
the transnational trafficking in U.S. commodities, culture, and ideas.
Thus, the prison industrial complex is much more than the sum of all the
jails and prisons in this country. It is a set of symbiotic
relationships among correctional communities, transnational
corporations, media conglomerates, guards’ unions, and legislative and
court agendas. If it is true that the contemporary meaning of punishment
is fashioned through these relationships, then the most effective
abolitionist strategies will contest these relationships and propose
alternatives that pull them apart. What, then, would it mean to imagine
a system in which punishment is not allowed to become the source of
corporate profit? How can we imagine a society in which race and class
are not primary determinants of punishment? Or one in which punishment
itself is no longer the central concern in the making of justice?

An abolitionist approach that seeks to answer questions such as these
would require us to imagine a constellation of alternative strategies
and institutions, with the ultimate aim of removing the prison from the
social and ideological landscapes of our society. In other words, we
would not be looking for prisonlike substitutes for the prison, such as
house arrest safeguarded by electronic surveillance bracelets. Rather,
positing decarceration as our overarching strategy, we would try to
envision a continuum of alternatives to imprisonment—demilitarization of
schools, revitalization of education at all levels, a health system that
provides free physical and mental care to all, and a justice system
based on reparation and reconciliation rather than retribution and
vengeance.

The creation of new institutions that lay claim to the
space now occupied by the prison can eventually start to crowd out the
prison so that it would inhabit increasingly smaller areas of our social
and psychic landscape. Schools can therefore be seen as the most
powerful alternative to jails and prisons. Unless the current structures
of violence are eliminated from schools in impoverished communities of
color—including the presence of armed security guards and police—and
unless schools become places that encourage the joy of learning, these
schools will remain the major conduits to prisons. The alternative would
be to transform schools into vehicles for decarceration. Within the
health care system, it is important to emphasize the current scarcity of
institutions available to poor people who suffer severe mental and
emotional illnesses. There are currently more people with mental and
emotional disorders in jails and prisons than in mental institutions.
This call for new facilities designed to assist poor people should not
be taken as an appeal to reinstitute the old system of mental
institutions, which were—and in many cases still are—as repressive as
the prisons. It is simply to suggest that the racial and class
disparities in care available to the affluent and the deprived need to
be eradicated, thus creating another vehicle for decarceration.

To reiterate, rather than try to imagine one single alternative to the
existing system of incarceration, we might envision an array of
alternatives that will require radical transformations of many aspects
of our society. Alternatives that fail to address racism, male
dominance, homophobia, class bias, and other structures of domination
will not, in the final analysis, lead to decarceration and will not
advance the goal of abolition.

It is within this context that it makes sense to consider the
decriminalization of drug use as a significant component of a larger
strategy to simultaneously oppose structures of
racism within the criminal justice system and further the abolitionist
agenda of decarceration. Thus, with respect to the project of
challenging the role played by the so-called War on Drugs in bringing
huge numbers of people of color into the prison system, proposals to
decriminalize drug use should be linked to the development of a
constellation of free, community-based programs accessible to all people
who wish to tackle their drug problems. This is not to suggest that all
people who use drugs—or that only people who use illicit drugs—need such
help. However, anyone, regardless of economic status, who wishes to
conquer drug addiction should be able to enter treatment programs.

Such institutions are, indeed, available to affluent communities. The
most well known program is the Betty Ford Center, which, according to
its Web site, “accepts patients dependent on alcohol and other mood
altering chemicals. Treatment services are open to all men and women
eighteen years of age and older regardless of race, creed, sex, national
origin, religion or sources of payment for care.ʺ¹³⁰ However, the cost
for the first six days is $1,175 per day, and after that $525 per
day.¹³¹ If a person requires thirty days of treatment, the cost would
amount to $19,000, almost twice the annual salary of a person working a
minimum-wage job.

Poor people deserve to have access to effective, voluntary drug
treatment programs. Like the Betty Ford program, their operation should
not be under the auspices of the criminal justice system. As at the Ford
Center, family members also should be permitted to participate. But
unlike the Betty Ford program, they should be free of charge. For such
programs to count as “abolitionist alternatives,” they would not be
linked—unlike existing programs, to which individuals are “sentenced”—to
imprisonment as a last resort.

The campaign to decriminalize drug use—from marijuana
to heroin—is international in scope and has led countries such as the
Netherlands to revise their laws, legalizing personal use of such drugs
as marijuana and hashish. The Netherlands also has a history of
legalized sex work, another area in which there has been extensive
campaigning for decriminalization. In the cases of drugs and sex work,
decriminalization would simply require repeal of all those laws that
penalize individuals who use drugs and who work in the sex industry. The
decriminalization of alcohol use serves as a historical example. In both
these cases, decriminalization would advance the abolitionist strategy
of decarceration—that is, the consistent reduction in the numbers of
people who are sent to prison—with the ultimate aim of dismantling the
prison system as the dominant mode of punishment. A further challenge
for abolitionists is to identify other behaviors that might be
appropriately decriminalized as preliminary steps toward abolition.

One obvious and very urgent aspect of the work of decriminalization is
associated with the defense of immigrants’ rights. The growing numbers
of immigrants—especially since the attacks on September 11, 2001—who are
incarcerated in immigrant detention centers, as well as in jails and
prisons, can be halted by dismantling the processes that punish people
for their failure to enter this country without documents. Current
campaigns that call for the decriminalization of undocumented immigrants
are making important contributions to the overall struggle against the
prison industrial complex and are challenging the expansive reach of
racism and male dominance. When women from countries in the southern
region are imprisoned because they have entered this country to escape
sexual violence, instead of being granted refugee status, this
reinforces the generalized tendency to punish people who are persecuted
in
their intimate lives as a direct consequence of pandemics of violence
that continue to be legitimized by ideological and legal structures.

Within the United States, the “battered women’s syndrome” legal defense
reflects an attempt to argue that a woman who kills an abusive spouse
should not be convicted of murder. This defense has been abundantly
criticized, both by detractors and proponents of feminism; the former do
not want to recognize the pervasiveness and dangers of intimate violence
against women and the latter challenge the idea that the legitimacy of
this defense resides in the assertion that those who kill their
batterers are not responsible for their actions. The point feminist
movements attempt to make—regardless of their specific positions on
battered women’s syndrome—is that violence against women is a pervasive
and complicated social problem that cannot be solved by imprisoning
women who fight back against their abusers. Thus, a vast range of
alternative strategies of minimizing violence against women—within
intimate relationships and within relationships to the state—should be
the focus of our concern.

The alternatives toward which I have gestured thus far—and this is only
a small selection of examples, which can also include job and living
wage programs, alternatives to the disestablished welfare program,
community-based recreation, and many more—are associated both directly
and indirectly with the existing system of criminal justice. But,
however mediated their relation might be to the current system of jails
and prisons, these alternatives are attempting to reverse the impact of
the prison industrial complex on our world. As they contest racism and
other networks of social domination, their implementation will certainly
advance the abolitionist agenda of decarceration.

Creating agendas of decarceration and broadly casting the net of
alternatives helps us to do the ideological work of pulling apart the
conceptual link between crime and punishment. This more nuanced
understanding of the social role of the punishment system requires us to
give up our usual way of thinking about punishment as an inevitable
consequence of crime. We would recognize that “punishment” does not
follow from “crime” in the neat and logical sequence offered by
discourses that insist on the justice of imprisonment, but rather
punishment—primarily through imprisonment (and sometimes death)—is
linked to the agendas of politicians, the profit drive of corporations,
and media representations of crime. Imprisonment is associated with the
racialization of those most likely to be punished. It is associated with
their class and, as we have seen, gender structures the punishment
system as well. If we insist that abolitionist alternatives trouble
these relationships, that they strive to disarticulate crime and
punishment, race and punishment, class and punishment, and gender and
punishment, then our focus must not rest only on the prison system as an
isolated institution but must also be directed at all the social
relations that support the permanence of the prison.

An attempt to create a new conceptual terrain for imagining alternatives
to imprisonment involves the ideological work of questioning why
“criminals” have been constituted as a class and, indeed, a class of
human beings undeserving of the civil and human rights accorded to
others. Radical criminologists have long pointed out that the category
“lawbreakers” is far greater than the category of individuals who are
deemed criminals since, many point out, almost all of us have broken the
law at one time or another. Even President Bill Clinton admitted that he
had smoked marijuana at one time, insisting, though, that he did not
inhale. However,
acknowledged disparities in the intensity of police surveillance—as
indicated by the present-day currency of the term “racial profiling”
which ought to cover far more territory than “driving while black or
brown”—account in part for racial and class-based disparities in arrest
and imprisonment rates. Thus, if we are willing to take seriously the
consequences of a racist and class-biased justice system, we will reach
the conclusion that enormous numbers of people are in prison simply
because they are, for example, black, Chicano, Vietnamese, Native
American or poor, regardless of their ethnic background. They are sent
to prison, not so much because of the crimes they may have indeed
committed, but largely because their communities have been criminalized.
Thus, programs for decriminalization will not only have to address
specific activities that have been criminalized—such as drug use and sex
work—but also criminalized populations and communities.

It is against the backdrop of these more broadly conceived abolitionist
alternatives that it makes sense to take up the question of radical
transformations within the existing justice system. Thus, aside from
minimizing, through various strategies, the kinds of behaviors that will
bring people into contact with the police and justice systems, there is
the question of how to treat those who assault the rights and bodies of
others. Many organizations and individuals both in the United States and
other countries offer alternative modes of making justice. In limited
instances, some governments have attempted to implement alternatives
that range from conflict resolution to restorative or reparative
justice. Such scholars as Herman Bianchi have suggested that crime needs
to be defined in terms of tort and, instead of criminal law, should be
reparative law. In his words, “[The lawbreaker] is thus no longer an
evil-minded man or woman, but simply a debtor, a
liable person whose human duty is to take responsibility for his or her
acts, and to assume the duty of repair.”¹³²

There is a growing body of literature on reshaping systems of justice
around strategies of reparation, rather than retribution, as well as a
growing body of experiential evidence of the advantages of these
approaches to justice and of the democratic possibilities they promise.
Instead of rehearsing the numerous debates that have emerged over the
last decades—including the most persistent question, “What will happen
to the murderers and rapists?”—I will conclude with a story of one of
the most dramatic successes of these experiments in reconciliation. I
refer to the case of Amy Biehl, the white Fulbright scholar from Newport
Beach, California, who was killed by young South African men in
Guguletu, a black township in Capetown, South Africa.

In 1993, when South Africa was on the cusp of its transition, Amy Biehl
was devoting a significant amount of her time as a foreign student to
the work of rebuilding South Africa. Nelson Mandela had been freed in
1990, but had not yet been elected president. On August 25, Biehl was
driving several black friends to their home in Guguletu when a crowd
shouting antiwhite slogans confronted her, and some of them stoned and
stabbed her to death. Four of the men participating in the attack were
convicted of her murder and sentenced to eighteen years in prison. In
1997, Linda and Peter Biehl—Amy’s mother and father—decided to support
the amnesty petition the men presented to the Truth and Reconciliation
Commission. The four apologized to the Biehls and were released in July
1998. Two of them—Easy Nofemela and Ntobeko Peni—later met with the
Biehls, who, despite much pressure to the contrary, agreed to see
them.¹³³ According to Nofemela, he wanted to say more about his own
sorrow for killing their daughter than what
had been possible during Truth and Reconciliation hearings. “I know you
lost a person you love,” he says he told them during that meeting. “I
want you to forgive me and take me as your child.”¹³⁴

The Biehls, who had established the Amy Biehl Foundation in the
aftermath of their daughter’s death, asked Nofemela and Peni to work at
the Guguletu branch of the foundation. Nofemela became an instructor in
an after-school sports program and Peni an administrator. In June 2002,
they accompanied Linda Biehl to New York, where they all spoke before
the American Family Therapy Academy on reconciliation and restorative
justice. In a _Boston Globe_ interview, Linda Biehl, when asked how she
now feels about the men who killed her daughter, said, “I have a lot of
love for them.” After Peter Biehl died in 2002, she bought two plots of
land for them in memory of her husband so that Nofemela and Peni can
build their own homes.¹³⁵ A few days after the September 11 attacks, the
Biehls had been asked to speak at a synagogue in their community.
According to Peter Biehl, “We tried to explain that sometimes it pays to
shut up and listen to what other people have to say, to ask: ‘Why do
these terrible things happen? ’ instead of simply reacting.”¹³⁶

RESOURCES

CRITICAL RESISTANCE: BEYOND THE
PRISON-INDUSTRIAL COMPLEX
www.criticalresistance.org
National Office:
1904 Franklin Street, Suite 504
Oakland, CA 94612
Phone: (510) 444-0484
Fax: (510) 444-2177
crnational@criticalresistance.org

 

NORTHEAST REGIONAL OFFICE
460 W. 128th Street
New York, NY 10027
Phone: (917) 493-9795
Fax: (917) 493-9798
crne@criticalresistance.org

 

SOUTHERN REGIONAL OFFICE
P.O. Box 791213
New Orleans, LA 70179
Phone: (504) 837-5348 or toll free (866) 579-0885
crsouth@criticalresistance.org

 

HUMAN RIGHTS WATCH PRISON PROJECT
350 5th Avenue, 34th Floor
New York, NY 10118-3299
Phone: (212) 290-4700
Fax: (212) 736-1300
hrwnyc@hrw.org
www.hrw.org

 

INCITE! WOMEN OF COLOR AGAINST VIOLENCE
P.O. Box 6861
Minneapolis, MN 55406-0861
Phone: (415) 553-3837
incite-national@yahoo.com
www.incite-national.org/

 

JUSTICE NOW (JUSTICE NETWORK ON WOMEN)
1322 Webster Street, Suite 210
Oakland, CA 94612
Phone: (510) 839-7654
Fax: (510) 839-7615
cynthia@jnow.org, cassandra@jnow.org
www.jnow.org

 

THE NATIONAL CENTER ON INSTITUTIONS
AND ALTERNATIVES (NCIA)
3125 Mt. Vernon Avenue
Alexandria, VA 22305
Phone: (703) 684-0373
Fax: (703) 549-4077
info@ncianet.org
www.ncianet.org/ncia; www.sentencing.org

 

PRISON ACTIVIST RESOURCE CENTER
P.O. Box 339
Berkeley, CA 94701
Phone: (510) 893-4648
Fax: (510) 893-4607
parc@prisonactivist.org
www.prisonactivist.org

 

PRISON LEGAL NEWS
2400 NW 80th Street, PMB #148
Seattle, WA 98117
Phone: (206) 781-6524
www.prisonlegalnews.org

 

PRISON MORATORIUM PROJECT
388 Atlantic Avenue, 3rd Floor
Brooklyn, NY 11217
Phone: (718) 260-8805
Fax: (212) 727-8616
pmp@nomoreprisons.org
www.nomoreprisons.org

 

THE SENTENCING PROJECT
514-10th Street NW #1000
Washington, DC 20004
Phone: (202) 628-0871
Fax: (202) 628-1091
www.sentencingproject.org

NOTES

1 Katherine Stapp, “Prisons Double as Mental Wards,” _Asheville Global
Report_, no. 164 (7-13 March 2002), www.agrnews.org. Stapp’s article
describes a study by Seena Fazel of Oxford University and John Danesh of
Cambridge University published in the British medical journal _The
Lancet_. According to Stapp, the researchers concluded, “One in seven
inmates suffers from a mental illness that could be a risk factor for
suicide, says the study. This represents more than one million people in
Western countries. The study’s authors . . . surveyed data on the mental
health of 23,000 prisoners in 12 Western countries over a period of
three decades. They found that prisoners ‘were several times more likely
to have psychosis and major depression, and about 10 times more likely
to have anti-social personality disorder, than the general population.’”

2 Elliot Currie, _Crime and Punishment in America_ (New York: Henry Holt
and Company, 1998), 21.

3 Mike Davis, “Hell Factories in the Field: A Prison-Industrial
Complex,” _The Nation_ 260, no.7 (20 February 1995).

4 The information in this paragraph regarding the dates California
prisons opened was taken from the Web site of the California Department
of Corrections. www.cdc.state.ca.us/facility/facil.htm.

5 www.cdc.state.ca.us/facility/instvspw.htm.

6 www.cdc.state.ca.us/facility/factsht.htm.

7 www.cdc.state.ca.us/facility/instccwf.htm.

8 Sandow Birk, _Incarcerated: Visions of California in the Twenty-First
Century_ (San Francisco: Last Gasp of San Francisco, 2001).

9 Ruth Wilson Gilmore, “Globalisation and U.S. Prison Growth: From
Military Keynesianism to Post-Keynesian Militarism,” _Race and Class_ 40
no. 2/3 (October 1998-March 1999): 174.

10 Gilmore, 184.

11 Gina Dent, “Stranger Inside and Out: Black Subjectivity in the
Women-in-Prison Film,” in _Black Cultural Traffic: Crossroads in Black
Performance and Black Popular Culture_, edited by Harry Elam and Kennel
Jackson (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, forthcoming 2003).

12 Marc Mauer, “Young Men and the Criminal Justice System: A Growing
National Problem” (Washington, D.C.: The Sentencing Project, 1990).

13 Marc Mauer and Tracy Huling, “Young Black Americans and the Criminal
Justice System: Five Years Later” (Washington, D.C.: The Sentencing
Project, 1995).

14 Allen J. Beck, Jennifer C. Karberg, and Paige M. Harrison, “Prison
and Jail Inmates at Midyear 2001,” Bureau of Justice Statistics Bulletin
(Washington, D.C.: U.S. Department of Justice, Office of Justice
Programs, April 2002, NCJ 191702), 12.

15 Adam Jay Hirsh, _The Rise of the Penitentiary: Prisons and Punishment
in Early America_ (New Haven and London: Yale University Press, 1992),
84.

16 Ibid., 71.

17 Ibid., 73.

18 Ibid., 74-75.

19 Milton Fierce, _Slavery Revisited: Blacks and the Southern Convict
Lease System, 1865-1933_ (New York: African Studies Research Center,
Brooklyn College, City University of New York, 1994), 85-86.

20 Mary Ann Curtin, _Black Prisoners and Their World, Alabama,
1865-1900_ (Charlottesville and London: University Press of Virginia,
2000), 6.

21 Curtin, 42.

22 Phillip S. Foner, ed. _The Life and Writings of Frederick Douglass.
Volume 4_: _Reconstruction and After_ (New York: International
Publishers, 1955), 379.

23 Cheryl Harris, “Whiteness as Property,” in _Critical Race Theory,_ by
Kimberlé Crenshaw, Neil Gotanda, Gary Peller, and Kendall Thomas. (New
York: The New Press, 1995).

24 On March 1, 2003, the INS was officially disestablished and its
operations were folded into the new Department of Homeland Security.

25 Matthew J. Mancini, _One Dies, Get Another: Convict Leasing in the
American South, 1866-1928_ (Columbia, S.C.: South Carolina Press, 1996),
25.

26 Ibid.

27 David Oshinsky, _“Worse Than Slavery”: Parchman Farm and the Ordeal
of Jim Crow Justice_ (New York: The Free Press, 1996).

28 Alex Lichtenstein, _Twice the Work of Free Labor: The Political
Economy of Convict Labor in the New South_ (London, New York: Verso),
1996.

29 Oshinsky, 45.

30 Curtin, 44.

31 Lichtenstein, 13.

32 Ibid., xix.

33 Ibid.

34 Curtin, 1.

35 Curtin, 213-14.

36 Michel Foucault, _Discipline and Punish: The Birth of the Prison_
(New York: Vintage Books, 1979), 234.

37 Ibid., 3.

38 Louis J. Palmer Jr., _The Death Penalty: An American Citizen’s Guide
to Understanding Federal and State Laws_ (Jefferson, N.C., and London:
McFarland & Co, Inc. Publishers, 1998).

39 Russell P. Dobash, R. Emerson Dobash, and Sue Gutteridge, _The
Imprisonment of Women_ (Oxford: Basil Blackwell, 1986), 19.

40 John Hirst, “The Australian Experience: The Convict Colony,” In _The
Oxford History of the Prison: The Practice of Punishment in Western
Society_, edited by Norval Morris and David J. Rothman (New York,
Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1998), 244.

41 Cesare Beccaria, _On Crimes and Punishments_ (Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press, 1995).

42 See Georg Rusche and Otto Kirchheimer, _Punishment and Social
Structure_ (New York: Columbia University Press, 1939), and Dario
Melossi and Massimo Pavarini, _The Prison and the Factory: Origins of
the Penitentiary System_ (Totowa, N.J: Barnes and Noble Books, 1981).

43 Estelle B. Freedman, _Their Sisters’ Keepers: Women’s Prison Reform
in America, 1830-1930_ (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1984),
10.

44 See discussion of John Howard’s 1777 report, _The State of the
Prisons in England and Wales_, in _A Just Measure of Pain: The
Penitentiary in the Industrial Revolution, 1750-1850,_ by Michael
Ignatieff (New York: Pantheon Books, 1978).

45 Jeremy Bentham, _The Panopticon and Other Prison Writings_ (London
and New York: Verso, 1995).

46 Charles Dickens, _The Works of Charles Dickens, Vol. 27, American
Notes_ (New York: Peter Fenelon Collier and Son, 1900), 119-20.

47 Gustave de Beaumont and Alexis de Tocqueville, _On the Penitentiary
System in the United States and its Application in France_ (Carbondale
and Edwardsville: Southern Illinois University Press), 1964 [1833].

48 Beaumont and Tocqueville, 131.

49 “Cold Storage: Super-Maximum Security Confinement in Indiana,” A
Human Rights Watch Report (New York: Human Rights Watch, October 1997),
13.

50 “Cold Storage,” 18-19.

51 For an extended discussion of the Supermax, see Craig Haney and Mona
Lynch, “Regulating Prisons of the Future: A Psychological Analysis of
Supermax and Solitary Confinement,” New _York University Review of Law
and Social Change_ 23 (1997): 477-570.

52 “Cold Storage,” 19.

53 Chase Riveland, “Supermax Prisons: Overview and General
Considerations.” (Washington, D.C.: National Institute of Corrections,
U.S. Department of Justice, January 1999), 4.

54 John Bender, _Imagining the Penitentiary: Fiction and the
Architecture of Mind in Eighteenth-Century England_ (Chicago and London:
University of Chicago Press, 1987), 2.

55 Ignatieff, 47.

56 Ibid., 53.

57 Bender, 1.

58 Ignatieff, 58.

59 Ibid., 52.

60 Bender, 29.

61 Ibid., 31.

62 Robert Burns, _I Am a Fugitive from a Georgia Chaingang_ (Savannah,
Ga.: Beehive Press, 1994).

63 George Jackson, _Soledad Brother: The Prison Letters of George
Jackson_ (Westport, Conn.: Lawrence Hill and Co., 1994).

64 Bettina Aptheker and Angela Davis, eds. _If They Come in the Morning:
Voices of Resistance_ (New York: Third Press, 1971).

65 Mumia Abu-Jamal, _Live from Death Row_ (New York: Addison-Wesley
Publishing Company, 1995), 65-67.

66 Mumia Abu-Jamal, _Death Blossoms_ (Farmington, Pa.: The Plough
Publishing House, 1997).

67 Mumia Abu-Jamal, _All Things Censored_ (New York: Seven Stories
Press, 2000).

68 Section 20411 of the Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of
1994 prohibited the award of Pell Grants to fund prisoners’ education.
It remains in effect today. See
usinfo.state.gov/infousa/laws/majorlaws/h3355_en.htm .

69 H. Bruce Franklin, ed. _Prison Writing in Twentieth-Century America_
(New York: Penguin Books, 1998), 13.

70 Malcolm X, _The Autobiography of Malcolm X (As Told to Alex Haley)_
(New York: Random House, 1965).

71 _The Last Graduation_, directed by Barbara Zahm. (Zahm Productions
and Deep Dish TV, 1997).

72 Marcia Bunney, “One Life in Prison: Perception, Reflection, and
Empowerment,” in _Harsh Punishment: International Experiences of Women’s
Imprisonment,_ edited by Sandy Cook and Susanne Davies (Boston:
Northeastern University Press, 1999), 29-30.

73 Assata Shakur, _Assata: An Autobiography_ (Westport, Conn.: Lawrence
Hill and Co., 1987).

74 Ibid., x.

75 Ibid._,_ 83-84.

76 Elizabeth Gurley Flynn, _The Alderson Story: My Life as a Political
Prisoner_ (New York: International Publishers, 1972).

77 ACE (Members of AIDS Counseling and Education), _Breaking the Walls
of Silence: AIDS and Women in a New York State Maximum Security Prison_
(New York: Overlook Press, 1998).

78 Vivien Stern, _A Sin Against the Future: Imprisonment in the World_
(Boston: Northeastern Press, 1998), 138.

79 See Elaine Showalter, “Victorian Women and Insanity,” in Madhouses,
Mad-Doctors and Madmen: The Social History of Psychiatry in the
Victorian Era, edited by Andrew Scull (Philadelphia: University of
Pennsylvania Press), 1981.

80 Luana Ross, _Inventing the Savage: The Social Construction of Native
American Criminality_. (Austin: University of Texas Press, 1998), 121.

81 Freedman, 15.

82 See Freedman, chapters 3 and 4.

83 Joanne Belknap, _The Invisible Woman: Gender, Crime, and Justice_
(Belmont, Calif.: Watsworth Publishing Company), 95.

84 Lucia Zedner, “Wayward Sisters: The Prison for Women,” in _The Oxford
History of the Prison: The Practice of Punishment in Western Society,_
edited by Norval Morris and David J. Rothman (New York: Oxford
University Press), 318.

85 Ibid., 318.

86 Currie, 14.

87 Ross, 89.

88 Ibid., 90.

89 Tekla Dennison Miller, _The Warden Wore Pink_ (Brunswick, Me.: Biddle
Publishing Company, 1996), 97-98.

90 Ibid., 100.

91 Ibid., 121.

92 _Philadelphia Daily News_, 26 April 1996.

93 American Civil Liberties Union Freedom Network, 26 August 1996,
aclu.org/news/w82696b.html.

94 _All Too Familiar: Sexual Abuse of Women in U.S. State Prisons_ (New
York: Human Rights Watch, December 1996), 1.

95 Ibid., 2.

96 www.oneword.org/ips2/aug98/03_56_003.

97 _Standard Minimum Rules for the Treatment of Prisoners_ (adopted by
the First United Nations Congress on the Prevention of Crime and the
Treatment of Offenders, held at Geneva in 1955, and approved by the
Economic and Social Council by its resolution 663 C (XXIV) of 31 July
1957 and 2076 (LXII) of 13 May 1977).

98 Amanda George, “Strip Searches: Sexual Assault by the State,”
www.aic.gov.au/publications/proceedings/20/george.pdf, 211-12.

99 Amanda George made this comment in the video _Strip Search_. Produced
by Simmering Video and Coalition Against Police Violence (date
unavailable).

100 Linda Evans and Eve Goldberg, “The Prison Industrial Complex and the
Global Economy” (pamphlet) (Berkeley. Calif.: Prison Activist Resource
Center, 1997).

101 See note 3.

102 _Wall Street Journal_, 12 May 1994.

103 Ibid.

104 Allen M. Hornblum, _Acres of Skin: Human Experiments at Holmesburg
Prison_ (New York: Routledge, 1998), xvi.

105 Hornblum, 212.

106 Hornblum, 37.

107 See A.S. Relman, “The New Medical Industrial Complex,” _New England
Journal of Medicine_ 30 (17) (23 October 1980): 963-70.

108 Vince Beiser, “How We Got to Two Million: How Did the Land of the
Free Become the World’s Leading Jailer?” _Debt to Society_,
MotherJones.com Special Report, 10 July 2001. Available at:
www.motherjones.com/prisons/overview.html, 6.

109 Paige M. Harrison and Allen J. Beck, “Prisoners in 2001,” Bureau of
Justice Statistics Bulletin (Washington, D.C.: U.S. Department of
Justice, Office of Justice Programs, July 2002, NCJ 195189), 1.

110 Allen Beck and Paige M. Harrison., “Prisoners in 2000,” Bureau of
Justice Statistics Bulletin (Washington, D.C.: U.S. Department of
Justice, Office of Justice Programs, August 2001, NCJ 1888207), 1.

111 Harrison and Beck, “Prisoners in 2001.”

112 Steve Donziger, _The Real War on Crime: Report of the National
Criminal Justice Commission_ (New York: Perennial Publishers, 1996), 87.

113 Allen J. Beck, Jennifer C. Karberg, and Paige M. Harrison. “Prison
and Jail Inmates at Midyear 2001,” Bureau of Justice Statistics Bulletin
(Washington, D.C., U.S. Department of Justice, Office of Justice
Programs, April 2002, NCJ 191702), 12.

114 Harrison and Beck, “Prisoners in 2001,” 7.

115 Ibid.

116 Sue Anne Pressley, “Texas County Sued by Missouri Over Alleged Abuse
of Inmates,” _Washington Post_, 27 August 1997, A2.

117 Madeline Baro, “Video Prompts Prison Probe,” _Philadelphia Daily
News,_ 20 August 1997.

118 “Beatings Worse Than Shown on Videotape, Missouri Inmates Say.” The
Associated Press, 27 August 1997, 7:40 P.M. EDT.

119 Joel Dyer, _The Perpetual Prison Machine: How America Profits from
Crime_ (Boulder, Col.: Westview Press, 2000).

120 Abby Ellin, “A Food Fight Over Private Prisons,” _New York Times,_
Education Life, Sunday, 8 April 2001.

121 See Julia Sudbury, “Mules and Other Hybrids: Incarcerated Women and
the Limits of Diaspora,” _Harvard Journal of African American Public
Policy_, Fall 2002.

122 Amanda George, “The New Prison Culture: Making Millions from
Misery,” in Sandy Cook and Susanne Davies, _Harsh Punishment:
International Experiences of Women’s Imprisonment,_ by Sandy Cook and
Susanne Davies (Boston: Northeastern Press, 1999), 190.

123 Press release issued by Wackenhut, 23 August 2002.

124 Ibid.

125 Dyer, 14.

126 See Amnesty International Press Release at
www.geocities.com/turkishhungerstrike/amapril.html.

127 www.hrw.org/wr2k2/prisons.html

128 www.suntimes.co.za/20

129 Arthur Waskow, resident, Institute for Policy Studies, _Saturday
Review_, 8 January 1972, quoted in Fay Honey Knopp, et al., _Instead of
Prisons: A Handbook for Abolitionists_ (Syracuse, N.Y.: Prison Research
Education Action Project, 1976), 15-16.

130 www.bettyfordcenter.org/programs/programs/index.html

131 www.bettyfordcenter.org/programs/programs/prices.html

132 Herman Bianchi, “Abolition: Assensus and Sanctuary,” in
_Abolitionism: Toward a Non-Repressive Approach to Crime_, eds. Herman
Bianchi and René Swaaningen (Amsterdam: Free University Press, 1986),
117.

133 Anthropologist Nancy Schepper-Hughes described this astonishing turn
of events in a talk she delivered at UC Berkeley on September 24, 2001,
entitled “Un-Doing: The Politics of the Impossible in the New South
Africa.”

134 Bella English, “Why Do They Forgive Us,” _Boston Globe_, 23 April
2003.

135 Ibid.

136 Gavin Du Venage, “Our Daughter’s Killers Are Now Our Friends,” _The
Straits Times_ (Singapore), 2 December 2 2001.

ABOUT THE AUTHOR

ANGELA YVONNE DAVIS is a professor of history of consciousness at the
University of California, Santa Cruz. Over the last thirty years, she
has been active in numerous organizations challenging prison-related
repression. Her advocacy on behalf of political prisoners led to three
capital charges, sixteen months in jail awaiting trial, and a highly
publicized campaign then acquittal in 1972. In 1973, the National
Committee to Free Angela Davis and All Political Prisoners, along with
the Attica Brothers, the American Indian Movement and other
organizations founded the National Alliance Against Racist and Political
Repression, of which she remained co-chairperson for many years. In
1998, she was one of the twenty-five organizers of the historic Berkeley
conference “Critical Resistance: Beyond the Prison Industrial Complex”
and since that time has served as convener of a research group bearing
the same name under the auspices of the University of California
Humanities Research Institute. Angela is author of many books, including
_Blues Legacies and Black Feminism: Gertrude “Ma” Rainey, Bessie Smith,
and Billie Holiday_. Her new book, forthcoming from Random House, is
_Prisons and Democracy_.

© 2003 by Angela Y. Davis

 

Open Media series editor, Greg Ruggiero.

 

All rights reserved. No part of this book may be reproduced, stored in a
retrieval system, or transmitted in any form, by any means, including
mechanical, electric, photocopying, recording or otherwise, without the
prior written permission of the publisher.

 

In Canada: Publishers Group Canada, 559 College Street, Suite 402,
Toronto, ON M6G 1A9

 

In the U.K.: Turnaround Publisher Services Ltd., Unit 3, Olympia Trading
Estate, Coburg Road, Wood Green, London N22 6TZ

 

In Australia: Palgrave Macmillan, 15-19 Claremont Street, South Yarra,
VIC 3141

 

 

eISBN : 978-1-609-80104-5

 

 
